In February, our oldest turned 18yr! Hard to believe I've been a mom that long!
On a personal note, my favorite Don Z. story reads as follows: One of the best shows I have ever seen in my life was in June of 1983 when MINOR THREAT opened for THE DAMNED at DC's Ontario Theater. I have never seen Minor Threat do a show that was less than great, but on this night they were beyond belief. The audience was set on a frenzy for the entirety of the set and it was not a gentle scene on the dance floor. After the set was over, I see Don walking crookedly out of the mass of people - he stands over six feet tall so he's easy to spot. Here's this guy, older than everyone there, shirt wet with sweat, glasses crooked, out of breath, eyes wide, huge grin across his face. He looks at me and says "They were great!" as he staggers out to the lobby.
As you can see I think we are going to be in the kitchen for awhile; there is still a lot of stuff in there!
*1 cup rolled oats
How different would your quality of life be if you made time throughout the day to experience la dolce far niente? Instead of using your free moments to catch up on what housewife bought what SUV on HULU, instead of checking your email one last time to see if anyone else is needing you to do something, instead of using your free time to check your bank accounts or pay that cell phone bill- What if you just did nothing?
I asked her what she had seen and what it meant. Her reply was this, " The lining of your womb is about 4 times the thickness it should be."
For those who don’t know, this long-running comedy panel game is chaired by Nicholas Parsons, and challenges four individual panellists to talk for sixty seconds on a given subject, “without repetition, hesitation or deviation”. I know that doesn’t sound particularly hilarious in itself, but the fun kicks in when the panellists start interrupting and mocking each other, or trying to defend their alleged infractions. Apparently the Beeb have tried to transfer the show to television several times before, but it’s never really stuck… which is a shame, because I thought it was very funny, and a much better use of the time-slot than the crappy quiz shows they normally shove in there.
It’s ironic. The United States fashioned its Iranian sanctions assuming that oil trades occur in US dollars. That assumption – an echo of the more general assumption that the US dollar will continue to dominate international trade – has given countries unfriendly to the US a great reason to continue their moves away from the dollar: if they don’t trade in dollars, America’s dollar-centric policies carry no weight! It’s a classic backfire: sanctions intended in part to illustrate the US’s continued world supremacy are in fact encouraging countries disillusioned with that very notion to continue their moves away from the US currency, a slow but steady trend that will eat away at its economic power until there is little left.
I had a motorcycle years ago, but I sold it when Kayleigh was little. I wasn't using it and we needed the money. I always kind of regretted it, and every spring and fall since then I've looked through the want ads to see what's out there. This year, Julia Joy was out there. I love her and will take very good care of her.
This insight Naomi has given us into the ‘performativity’ of this object, what it has been affording us to do, what relationships it prompted over centuries (i.e., the act of touching Naomi refers to, and the way this would have evolved over the years, as one would become more familiar with the object), is what we think Moor Stories is about.
Why oh WHY do we deny ourselves happiness? Remember the good things and smile! Teach others around you how you deal, by allowing happiness back in. Be good to yourself. Say yes to invites. Do things that make you happy. Allow happy back in and your heart will soften. Who knows.. you may even find happiness. :)
It was one of this occasions when I found myself mentally composing one of those 'emails to the council' about the way a store had been situated in a manner that created major road disruption. But I soon snapped out of it.
“Yeah, did he also tell you he fucks men! That he brings perverts and child molesters back with 'im!” my mother retorted. She tried to do that thing that women do where they say something clever and then pout their lips and slam their hands on their hips, but in her state she just kinda stumbled a few steps forward and stood there growling with a whiskey laden face.
The photo speaks for itself.
2) healthy relationships aren’t based on emotional abuse, domination and a mountain of deliberate lies and manipulation
The rules of officers of plc companies state they ‘should not buy or sell shares in their company while in possession of unpublished, price-sensitive information’. Somewhat incredibly, Tesco is arguing this morning that ‘Bob’ was not in possession such data. Their spin department this morning claimed, ‘We are confident that Bob was not in possession of any price-sensitive information at the time that the sale was approved.’
2. having an abortion
Then just sit back and be pursued by a few girls that will make out with you in your car and then bail, or will take you out for Vegan once and never call again; and by absolutely nobody else.
-”I”m sorry too.I didn’t mean to worry you.”
In fact, one of my many earlier suggestions had been precisely that we should raise native regiments, officered by the British, but as part of the British Army, not the ANA, equipped by us, with British NCOs, and paid by us. Once knocked into shape, we could then hand them over to the Afghan government.
Creative Aging Festival: Best Practices to Engage Older Adults
Now I know the Chinese are a wise people and I’m thinking no matter how straight I’m standing, no matter how far over my eyes I keep my hat, no matter how much I try to channel Jimi and Janis in my head, this guy sees through it all. This is misguided respect for sure- Respect for age sure but what about for my wisdom- my spiritual aura, my iconic, ageless, timeless presence- would you offer a seat to a statue?
Preface: This 12 oz. bottle of Dundee Irish Red Lager was sent to me by the folks at Genesee Brewing Co., not only for inclusion in these tasting notes, but as part of a “virtual “beer tasting… more on that later. (There is a dating code on the neck of the bottle 0430 R 11:34 4W.)
Tonight, corn dog bites, tater tots, and chocolate pudding. Man food.
As always, the DT girls have provided some great inspiration. If you get a chance, please visit their individual blogs and leave them some well deserved love.
Now, I stare out the window, the telephone still in my hand. Tears are falling down my cheek and dripping onto the cold metal. I can’t look down at it. Not yet.
Jennifer Weiner grew up in Connecticut and graduated with a degree in English literature from Princeton University. She is the #1 New York Times bestselling author of the novels Good in Bed (2001); In Her Shoes (2002), which was turned into a major motion picture starring Cameron Diaz, Toni Collette and Shirley MacLaine; Little Earthquakes (2004); Goodnight Nobody (2005); the short story collection The Guy Not Taken (2006); Certain Girls (2008); Best Friends Forever (2009); Fly Away Home (2010); and most recently, Then Came You (2011).
Or a chef.
Incredible! Fantastic! :-)
In fact, considering how so very wrong these corporate 'arrangements' can go, this particular beer really is pretty bloody marvellous – and I would challenge any beer aficionado to offer anything like a damning verdict on it.
Due to our weakness, our prayers are probably not always perfect, but we are assured by God that he will answer our prayers without fail, but the result may not be exactly as we want. If you are a loving parent will you give a stone to eat when your child asks for bread? Or a snake for a fish? This means that God, in his love for us, will not give us a stone in the place of bread, and from this we can draw the corollary “nor will he give us a stone if we ask for stone instead of bread.“
Resistance of water, the warmth, snow, moon light and stones…
That’s about it from me for this week. If you made it this far I hope there was something you found interesting. Next week I promise* not to blog about an event I’ve attended.
The bad news is that it would take a vat of cranberry sauce and four more glasses of wine to make that Tofurky edible. I sincerely apologize to Turtle Island Foods who makes the Tofurky Roast, because I know they have the best of intentions and I'm sure they did their very best to make it taste as good as possible.
Cop in court over uniforms
Diva isn’t necessarily a great song (nor is it unnecessarily a bad one) but the infamous Dana International will always be a worthy winner for far more political and social reasons. The first and only (to our knowledge) transgender singer to win the contest, there was the expected controversy surrounding her participation. Part of me likes to think that some people voted for her not for the song, but just to annoy those people who protested her entry. By all means, protest against a song because it’s terrible, but not because someone who’s singing it happens to be this or that (or both). Eurovision, despite having a remit that does not allow any political content in its songs, does have a small role to play within the context of Europe and its society. This year, for example, Turkey have entered a contestant with Jewish descent. This isn’t just a ploy to finally get some votes from Israel: the government have explicitly declared that the decision was made to try to ease tensions within the country. There has also been some coverage of Azerbaijan’s dodgy human rights record, and although Eurovision will not get involved directly, many are hoping the international gaze will provoke some change.
That leads me to the second change I made. I changed it from a lunch bag to a picnic lunch bag because it's freakin' huge!!
Think of it as “your own personal Darwin” (boom badda BIM ba, boom boom badda BIM ba). Set a steady course of small incremental improvements. Wait until you have automated the desired behaviour, THEN move onto the next step. If you need to take a few days off of improvement now and again, that’s fine. Just make sure that you know when you are climbing back on the donkey.
13 Band Introduction
So even thought I was stressed to take both of them to begin with we seem to have a routine down pat
Players from Western New York Flash and Philadelphia Independence were left stunned by the first-half incident which halted play and took the attention away from the important match at hand.
As a result of the f a g-pride festival organizers’ complaint and the investigation by the commission, some groups that have done business with “Hands On Originals” in the past are now bulling the company. A commissioner said earlier this month that f a g business owners have the right to turn down business from Christians, but not the other way around.
Are the rest of us black and white
Léa Seydoux, 26, wore a long-sleeved eggplant Christian Dior Fall 2012 top (sans bra) with a textured calf-length violet purple full skirt with sheer striped panels detailing. The sexy ensemble was accessorized with a thin black belt and eggplant open-toe platform wedges.
Q. What is StoryMineMedia, and what do you hope to achieve?
Where, as the breezes pass,
But, you know, things out of school are fun. Like painting, or reading. You don’t need to follow an specific pattern to do it, you just do it.
222) my youngest and his cousin making me the trellis needed for the peas coming up in the garden
Well, Mahmoud, let’s see. Persian (ancient Iranian) and Arab Muslims, for example, began the mass enslavement of black Africans several centuries before Europeans did. And then China and Russia slaughtered millions of their own people during their Communist revolutions.
Gardening, nature rambles, farming and stuff feel good because of cow poo.
That’s rising up over your old horizon
I have a question to ask my partner tomorrow and I’m just dreading the answer. the question is- do YOU like having me for a roommate? (not do you love me, not do you enjoy my being your husband, but do you enjoy having me as a roommate?)…I’m quite certain the answer is a big, fat, NO…which is heartbreaking and has left me feeling like someone has just kicked my insides out.
Dining Room Source Guide:
The sweetness of the malt is tempered by a rye tang and more deep earthier notes. It’s extremely quaffable and hides the alcohol very well indeed. Smooth nuttiness hints of cherry and chocolate. Top end it’s that clean bitterness from the centennial, slight citrus and then more citrus from the Citra on the finish. Bit of herbal more rounded spicy notes too. VERY VERY pleased - hope everyone else enjoys it too!
Does she really like to cuddle?
Although there are no public details on how DDR4 SRAM’s extra multiplexing level works, GDDR5 memory already employs a bank-grouping scheme with an extra level of multiplexing. GDDR5 memory adds new command timings that differ depending on whether successive commands address the same or different bank groups. These extra timings mean that a DDR4-optimized memory controller must be a bit more complex than the controller used for DDR3 memories. The controller needs better command scheduling and it must deal even more efficiently with high-priority memory commands. The Cadence DDR4 memory controller that was just introduced last month has several new features to accommodate the new complexities of the upcoming DDR4 memory protocol said Greenberg.
Thanks to Whoopdi Friggin Doo,
God claims you and I as his children. This is a wonderful gift and identity that is good for our heart and soul, and something that is more powerful than all the medicine in the world.
On All Hallows Eve, Hallowe'en - or in the Celtic way, Samhain, I make a little compost and sow a few seeds for the soul. Samhain is the end of the Celtic year, the beginning of winter, a time to reflect and consider, a time to slough off old, unwanted things and plant new hopes which will start to sprout with the spring snowdrops. Here's a poem to mark the turning of the year.
“Dear me, this is highly unusual. You made a choice to run away from a miserable life and asked to be set free? Correct?”
So meet "Duckie" by Elisabeth. You can get him HERE. Duckie is colored with Copics. The DP is a combination of SU, Basic Grey, and Bo Bunny. The sentiment is computer generated and I used SB circle and scalloped circle dies. Ribbon is from stash.
Locker Talk: Slide at 3.5 inches
I'm a huge fan of books about time-travel. One of my favourite adult novels is 'The Time Traveller's Wife' and I love the idea of being able to travel both into the future and into the past to revisit people and events. Jackson's ability to travel through time is initially explained at the start of the book in a very manner of fact type of way, which makes it feel like although this is something quite extraordinary, it's also believable and not beyond the realms of possibility. Because Jackson is constantly time-travelling I did have to concentrate on keeping track of what was happening and when but the date and time were often provided at the start of the chapter which made this a bit easier.
Mercury is a heavy metal naturally found in the environment. However, it is not suitable for human consumption, as it is extremely harmful to the human body, especially the brain. While some people say that anything can be consumed in moderation, many experts agree that no amount of mercury is safe for the human body. Despite this and the many studies concerning the negative effects of mercury, the heavy metal is continually added to mandatory vaccines and processed foods.
The names on this list are not surprising. Most of them are corporations with heavy stakes in the tar sands with new projects awaiting approval. This includes Shell. It becomes increasingly clear Shell is willing to pull out all the stops and pursue all angles to try and argue there is nothing wrong with current projects to give way for a clear path for approvals of their two new projects, Jackpine Mine Expansion and Pierre River Mine. Both projects currently under review and being contested by the Athabasca Chipewyan First Nation. It should also be mentioned that Shell has also been involved in lobby efforts in the EU to try and dissuade EU countries from labeling tar sands as a high carbon fuel.
So pubs are thriving then? People are flocking to those pubs? Not according to Mintel:
In a statutory declaration (SD) dated June 18, 2008, RPK declared that he was reliably informed that Acting Colonel Aziz Buyong, a C4 expert, was the person who had placed the explosives on various parts of the Mongolian lady, Altantuya’s (apparently already dead from two gun shots to her head) body in the presence of Datin Seri Rosmah Mansor (wife of the Deputy PM Najin Tun Razak) and Norhayati (wife of Aziz). He further declared that he was reliably informed that a military report confirming the aforesaid was handed to the Prime Minister, who then passed it on to his son-in-law, Khairy Jamaludin, for safe-keeping. Next, he was told that one of Rulers is also aware of the on-goings.
I have learned that I love myself and I love who I am becoming. I have learned that being alone can, at many times, be an advantage. As a single person I have more time and more motivation to improve myself. I have more reason to go out and meet new people and not have to worry about what my significant other will think about it. I believe that the more people you meet and the more connections you make, the more opportunities are opened up for you.
...but to do that we must keep pushing hard, dynamically and vigorously, evading the traps. (For example the meme spread by Fox that the uber-aristocracy and only the uber-rich are trustworthy, eliminating all other, competing elites.)
Peter Eisenman on being a B-Grade architect…
· If your job or your lifestyle poses an increased risk to health insurance companies, think of ways to alleviate the risk. Prove to the underwriter that you have taken safety courses or obtained licenses as evidence of your commitment to safety.
Then I look around and realize that people are motivated because it’s nice to see someone who has the same struggles as you – you can relate. Someone who is encouraging you to keep up the hard work because they are working hard to meet their goals, too. I am most motivated by the people in my life who are working just as hard as I am – who have goals just like mine. The people who haven’t met their goals yet…but are a work in progress. Those are the people who’s voices sound most clear to me. And perhaps, that is who finds inspiration in my journey as well.
And this morning, I sat down and remembered a prayer which I read weeks ago, and it haunts me with exquisite simplicity.
My lips whispered the silent lyrics.
Every volunteer gets a Race T-shirt
I tried on 400 dresses today. Ok, maybe not 400, but it felt like it. I can tell you that navy blue and horizontal stripes are popular this year. I can also tell you that I prefer horizontal stripes on my curtains, not on my posterior.
Jam is really very forgiving; the sugar is a powerful preservative. Scare stories about bottling tend to be about preserving vegetables, with no sugar involved. Chemical sterilisation and very careful attention to detail is much more important there - and one reason among many why I don't actually do that. (Not often having a surplus of veg, and the existence of tins and supermarket freezer sections are other reasons.)
“Ash,” the dragon continued, “Welcome to Terra Illumina…or as it is more commonly known, Fallenwood.” Then a fierce roaring laugh erupted from the stone, as though the dragon thought the new name a joke. “A dark, difficult, dangerous path lies before you, Ash Kensington.”
Nor dulls
The only really easy thing about the game is that Hammond allows you to kill 100 of the non-rex-or-raptor dinosaurs before you fail. At first this seemed like a tall order, since there are lots of dinosaurs and they keep alternating between “good” and “bad” and “human”, so switching from tranquilizer to lethal weapons was somewhat annoying. But then I got fed up with some compsognathuses and blew them away with my shotgun, only to find that the limit of 100 is per level, not per game. After that, I didn’t even care. Only if I got under 10 dinosaurs remaining would my reign of terror end.
I've been taken up with life, and Facebook, but you'd be surprised how often I think of those of you I haven't been in contact with. A lot has happened, sad things and happy things.
Christian rapper’s new project features collaborations with Lecrae, Mikeschair, Benjah, Jai and more
Six letters to six people in six weeks.
And this may be cheesy, but his most comfortable and favorite place is in his momma's arms. He is a true momma's boy. I am SERIOUS. Never seen anything like it. Won't let me out of his sight. And I am ok with it. I LOVE him and the JOY he brings....just not while I am cooking dinner. Hard to cook with one arm and a little boy wanting everything on the counter....
In the wake of last week’s post, I’d meant to plunge straight into the next part of this sequence of posts and talk about the unraveling of American politics. Still, it’s worth remembering that the twilight of America’s global empire is merely an incident in the greater trajectory of the end of the industrial age, and part of that greater trajectory may just have come into sight over the last week.
Now, you have no idea how tired I am ! So tired that at the elections, I wanted to sign before voting and wasn't finding the envelope ! Well done sleepy Flore !!
In my opinion, cold calling is an art. Don’t get me wrong, everyone can pick up a phone, dial a number and spit out a script but the art of it comes in being able to sell. Whether you are selling your product, your company or just an appointment, it’s important to have a plan before you start.
“Wah, wah, wah…” This is not a sob story, although sobs and snot were definitely involved.
good...
6PM - 8:30PM
Then one night I was surprised at what I found.
Infinite time. I want to do justice to so many things which I am currently doing now and which i
A lifestyle and home decor magazine that believes "in making design choices that lead to personal happiness"
Now, I spend the winter in wellies, sheepskin biker boots,
War, however, is the lifeblood of the profits of the military/security complex, and war is the chosen method of the neoconservatives for achieving their goal of American hegemony.
Two loads of laundry. Cleaned the floors. Quilted most of my Log Cabin Quilt. Bet you are ready to see some pictures of that! Almost have my Civil War Love Letters quilt pieced (yes, I have been busy on that one)! Cut out a quilt so it is now ready to piece. Made a trip to Madison to Lowes for some necessary items (which included a new iron). Picked up lunch at Rally's so I did sit down long enough to eat. And finally fixed dinner and got the dishes in the dishwasher. I go back to work tomorrow to get some needed rest! lol
To be a person is to have a story. Without my story, I have no identity. My story is made up of others who are the markings along the journey and help make up my individual story. Each individual story contributes to the universal story of humanity. Sometimes in the midst of the noise, we need to take notice of the individual stories in the midst of the community. In doing so the crowd become people, co-workers become friends and our work becomes ministry–shepherding all those around us.
Does she jump off the floor with both feet? A million times a day. With gusto.
These are just five favorite events in Willow's Week. I take joy in searching for positive, pleasing things in my life. It just makes the week go better. Thanks to Susanne who faithfully hosts Friday Fave Five, and thanks to all the other people who post their faves to encourage the rest of us.
I found this tribute to family history that I just love. Geneaology has been my hobby for years and years now. I think this explains so well why anyone takes this hobby on.
It wasn’t until Chris reached the middle of the street that he noticed there were no living people walking about as they had been earlier that night. He wondered if he could no longer see them, or if something had actually frightened them away. The something that was frightening him was only about ten yards away when he heard a faint rustling sound.
Enrichment...ah a thought from the past...remember the days when we could enrich our students with multiple experiences that would engage and excite them everyday? Long before state standardized testing ruled the day, we used to believe in educating the whole child. One of my fondest memories was the year we had a summer enrichment program for at risk students where the theme was flight. We used this theme for math and reading activities, as well as exposing them to a hot-air balloon launch, sky divers at the school and a field trip to Dulles Airport to watch the planes take off. You know what was so exciting for them was going up and down the escalator (which we do not have in the small town of Fredericksburg, Va.).
This sort of thing could never happen even in your worst nightmares.
2 c cherry tomatoes, halved
Bernard Martin argues in The Ancient Mariner and the Authentic Narrative that Coleridge was also influenced by the life of Anglican clergyman John Newton, who had a near-death experience aboard a slave ship.
This evening Hazel and I arrived in heavy rainfall at Hayling Island Sailing Club but this did not dampen the good humour of this social gathering!
You love to put on your shoes.
Through the stories of highway killers, we see how the “killer on the road,” like the train robber, the gangster, and the mobster, entered the cast of American outlaws, and how the freeway—conceived as a road to utopia—came to be feared as a highway to hell.
Each and every single day I tell my son to try his hardest, to look me in the eyes and know, that when I tell him he is the smartest little boy I know, that it is the truth. As the School District you should be doing the same thing, but instead, like I’ve said before, you have chosen to ignore him.
winter fog
Fr. Dimitry Dudko, in particular, says very similar things. He makes a very important point also: When someone once told him how much better it was to be in the West because there they have freedom and are able to practice their Christianity in freedom, he said: “But there they have spirituality with comfort. Here we have spirituality with suffering, and therefore it’s deeper.” On the basis of suffering and martyrdom there can come a seed of Christianity, because “the blood of the martyrs is the seed of the Church.” That is why something very deep is happening in the Russian people and those who have suffered under Communism.
The Premium Edition, of course, comes in a lovely two-sided collectible packaging and both the DVD and Blu-ray versions of the series. There are a few extras on the discs themselves such as a few NIS America trailers but the best extra continues to be the hardcover book containing character artwork, scenery collection and episode synopsis.
“When are you coming to see your favorite uncle?”
Armageddon (commonly known as the battle against the anti-Christ) according to the Bible, is the site of a battle during the end times, variously interpreted as either a literal or symbolic location. The term is also used in a generic sense to refer to any end-of-the-world scenario.
I confess that after many episodes of Stock Photo Girl and Stock Photo Woman I still don’t know the secret of her appeal. She is a part of me, I guess, but not just me. She is in the very fabric of our universe. She lives in the sky, in the scent of fresh lilacs, and the call of the birds at Fort Mason early in the morning as I walk to catch my bus, She is what she is, Eternally. Woman. Sex. Joy. Mystery. Long live the Stock Photo Woman!! I am so thrilled that you have some new photos for me to use. I know you did it just for me. No? Oh, please don’t break my heart! I cannot bear it!
I love that this weekend is when we “spring forward” and our days become longer. I’ve been thinking a lot about what it means to “spring forward”. I like to think of it as a reminder to not only move my clock forward but move my mind forward as well.
Vit D3 – 150iu/kg
Tink -
This routine is ruptured when Lurie spots Soraya in the street with two children who can only be hers and the two of them catch each other's eye. This intrusion of her personal life into their private arrangement is never mentioned by either of them at their next appointment but they both know something has changed and their arrangement comes to an end. Lurie's solution to this problem is to fall back on the tried and tested formula of sleeping with one of his students. The girl he selects, Melanie Isaacs, is 20 years old 'small and thin, with close cropped hair, wide, almost Chinese cheekbones, large, dark eyes', and whilst he finds himself falling rather harder for her than he intended she never seems to be fully committed. One sexual episode in particular highlights what we might call acquiescence rather than real participation.
I've just watched the BBC film about the Rostropovitch, which gives a great sense of the passionate physicality of the person and his musically extraordinary playing: well worth watching. I remembered the one occasion I heard him live, in 1988, immediately after the Armenian earthquake that killed up to 45,000. He was from neighbouring Azerbaijan, and organised a concert literally overnight in central London in support of the relief efforts, and to commemorate the suffering. He played the Bach unaccompanied cello concertos and insisted that there should be no applause. It was an incredibly sombre, moving concert.
If I can say anything to you – it is this – Hold on to Jesus! When you have problems and issues happening in life – Hold on to Jesus! Hold on till that encounter changes you!
which is a great example of why I made the decision to leave.
and possible injunctive relief on rivals. But presumably the effectiveness of
Still, some telling testimony was lodged by project opponents, including Patti Hagan (left) of the Prospect Heights Action Coalition, who called the Modified General Project Plan under consideration a “Ghost Project Plan” because it lacks a site plan, renderings, and a current financial analysis.
60gm shortening
The challenge this week is OPEN--just be sure to have your butterfly, fairy or angel!!!
I live noone's life but my own.
I've often driven out of Nottingham on the A610, straight up Alfreton Road, and thought there'd be some likely candidates for a good lunch in the vicinity. Last week I finally got round to stopping and taking a look, and was pleased to discover my suspicions were correct.
PS: The last prompt for the the April Heights - 2012. Had a great time with all of you guys...thanks Leo for the opportunity and thank you everyone for your encouragement and support. Hope to see you in touch in future too... :)
Celerie Kemble, daughter of acclaimed Palm Beach interior designer Mimi McMakin, has recently published a book titled “Black & White (and a bit in between): Timeless Interiors, Dramatic Accents and Stylish Collections.” I liked the book because it's fascinating seeing a focus on just black and white and I liked the advice Kemble gives.
At Bowling Green the wind combs through the red tulips and flattens them alongside the fountain.
Their ancestors spared
Best Sound was awarded to the play Bad Memories, directed by Julian Simpson (Doctor Who ‘The Rebel Flesh’/’The Almost People’).
The death toll from flash floods and mudslides in Rio de Janeiro’s picturesque Serrana region reached 702 on Tuesday, a number that is likely to rise further in one of Brazil’s worst natural disasters on record.
Add the pot and steam for about 10 minutes.
After I found out that they had searched for 3 hours for a new bath robe for me that was absorbant I realized how bad this lovely purple robe really was. So I started watching for some towels that I could make a new robe with. It has taken me 3 months but I did it.
Perhaps you too can relate to being comforted by your parents lack of fear as a kid. But let’s remember that, while our parents had knowledge about life’s circumstances and what would most likely happen, they could not plan out our days with rigidly precise detail, the plans they did make, they couldn’t keep perfectly, and certainly because they are human their plans for us were not always for our best. If we were comforted by our parents being unafraid, the knowledge that God is not afraid should do wonders for our fearful hearts.
The English doctor, not to be outdone, said 'Hah!. We can take an
The thing is, New American Cinema is different from American Independent if only that the former inspired the latter. We’re watching a lot more Altman, Scorsese, and Coppola than I would have expected, but really I should have seen at least two Malick films.
Riddle has thrown for 618 yards and 5 touchdowns against The Citadel in two previous meetings. 321 of those yards and 4 of the TDs were to Terrell Hudgins (who also scored a TD against the Bulldogs the year before Riddle arrived at Elon).
Gell discovered that "art objects" (which he calls "indexes"), in
Watching a car drive away, laden with a life.
“Gracie, we’re going to the park. You’re going to like it.”
They found nothing at all. This has strengthened our hope that he is still on the Taf and just needs finding, as we have felt all along but yesterday's result has given us a little peace of mind and checked another box.
7. Tennessee Jed - 7:59
Eric Croft, a former Democratic state lawmaker who sponsored the corrective legislation, believes that Wasilla’s mayor knew what was going on. (She does seem to have paid heed to every other detail of town life, including what books were on the library’s shelves.)
Flashpacking is the love-child of budget and luxury, and means that you can now travel your way, without being boxed in by what you should wear or how you should act. This is one hobby anyone can do and make their own.
If this is an indication of the line-up of 2011 weddings ahead of me, it's going to be a beautiful year!
AYR: I posed questions to Goodstein, via spokeswoman Suzy Halpin at Rubenstein Communications. She responded, "I am pleased to confirm the acquisition, but have no additional comment." I bet it's inevitable. And Brooklyn Tomorrow is a signal example of major newspaper publishers' willingness to curry favor with advertisers and big corporations.
Whew! Maybe country living isn't quite as relaxing as I once thought.
While playing around one day with my Craft-Dee BowZ I wound up creating another method of making bows for your cards. It sort of surprised me when I did it and then I decided to put it to the test. Here's the result of my fiddling:
My initial thought was how did I not know about this and does everyone else know but decided to keep it secret or have I discovered a fantastic little gem that few know about? I then thought what a fantastic present for the lady in your life; Mom, sister, wife, girlfriend… and then I saw there is a Glossy Box for men too, so now everyone can benefit from this bountiful box!
There’s nothing wrong with that, per se. Of course companies want to reduce the number of employees who steal from them. But some part of me squirms at this pervasive and increasingly intelligent monitoring. Would I really want my boss to have always-on recordings not just of my body but my keystrokes? Would you?
the origin of the species
--ninety-nine,
But Bradley announced that she had asked to be replaced “for personal reasons,” a common euphemism. He also indicated that she thought the committee ought to be bigger and include the commission's only defense attorney to balance DA Bradley, a hint at the tension between the two.
What lengths have you gone to ensure your children still believe in Santa?
The four way convertible bras come in many different sizes up to a 38DD. If animal print isn't your thing there also have four-way deep-v push up bras in black & white, as well as leopard or zebra.
Griffin Mountain
Yo pun, pick me up, come to queens with us
Here's another quick, healthy sandwich favorite my whole family loves (I'm on a sandwich kick lately). These bold and yummy sandwiches are filled with fresh vegetables, kidney beans, and seasonings, and pack such a giant flavor that they don't miss the meat at all.
Instead of doing lots of reading of government paper work because I am applying for Social Security and Medicare.... argh ! ! !
"The province was identified as a potential hot spot. All these were official programmes aimed at engaging local stakeholders in the fight against crime, including consultation with local authorities as part of preparation for the elections," he said in a statement.
Here we were at the beginning of the car wash; the attendant did not even have enough time to dip his brush into his soapy mixture to scrub windows or tires. We shot forward with more G-force than the faster roller coaster in America. All of us were pushed so far back into our seats we could not lift our heads. Our checks were flapping so fast we looked like our golden lab with his head sticking out the back of a pick up. Suddenly from the beginning of our acceleration point we were transported to the blower area of the car wash. This happened so fast we were stunned, not knowing what happened or what to do next. We heard the attendant over the blower noise advising us to reverse slowly. My husband complied. When we again reached the starting point, my husband rolled down his window just in time to hear the attendant say: Ever been to a car wash before, Sir? Being the good wife I am; I dissolved into laughter. My husband was embarrassed and did not laugh but our car was super clean.
President and CEO of Breathe California Margo Sidener states “We are excited to work with PRIDE as they serve a population that is targeted by the tobacco industry and has one of our highest rates of smoking. Together, I believe that we can make a real difference!”
created by civilization. Millions of people live in cities and ignoring
Bruce is pre-deceased by his mother (Peggy) father (Bob), and is survived by his brothers Rob and Tom (Sharon), nephews Stuart, Trevor and Kevin; nieces Jennifer, Meagan and Shannon. Friends and associates should join for a celebration of life at 4:00 pm on Thursday, July 14th at the Swans Suite Hotel, 506 Pandora Avenue, Victoria, B.C.
Well, there was a fire. And it’s not related to the marathon.
Institutes of Religion: Weekday instruction for college students to counteract the independent thought and knowledge they are subjected to in their secular classes.
ということで、エッグハント。復活際というと、ジェリービーンズやチョコレート菓子が入ったプラスチックの卵を子供が探すアクティビティー。復活祭（イースター）前日の夜、夫と２人でプラスチックの卵の中にジェリービーンズやチョコなどを詰めました。そんな時、彼と親なんだな〜、と実感して、結婚してしばらく経つにもかかわらず妙に感動してしまいました。詰め終わった後、夫にリビングとダイニングルームに卵を隠すお仕事を担当してもらいました。ランプの上だったり、ろうそく立ての中だったり、面白いところに隠していましたよ。隠すと言っても、見えるところなんですが。娘達は復活祭の朝起きると、お菓子入りの卵を探すのをとても楽しみにしていました。普段朝にキャンディーを食べさせないのだけど、復活祭の日は特別ということで、許したので、嬉しそうに食べていました。
You said that I abandoned you and the kids. No. I left (abandoned) you. But, truthfully, you are the one who abandoned me first…. you abandoned all of us….over and over again. Every time you chose alcohol over us. Every time you stayed out all night without calling. Every time you said mean things to me, but, couldn’t remember saying them the next day.. and then expected me to just forget it because you were drunk. Every time you chose to sit in your office on the computer for hours instead of spending time with us. Every time you would come home from work already drinking, and then continue to drink until you passed out. Every time we had a “family day” and you would get drunk. Every time we went on a vacation and you would drink too much, making me not want to be around you…then you would blame me for being “boring”…or we would get into a fight over something stupid because you were being irrational, like tattoos, even temporary ones… Yes, you always felt bad, apologized, and made promises to stop or cut back….but, after a while I stopped believing you because those apologies and promises lost their meaning. So, I know how it feels when someone who is supposed to love you, isn’t there any longer…oh yeah, physically you were there, but, you might as well not have been.
I could walk freely
I'd like to suggest we, as a species, grow up already.
Bach, perhaps best known as the former front-man of Skid Row, is an accomplished Broadway actor and television personality. Bach is also a solo artist and most recently released the album, Angel Down, in the fall of 2007 by Merovingian Music, Ltd. For more information, visit www.sebastianbach.com
Blu now plays with the kitten, George, but doesn't sleep with him yet.
SÉAN Ó FAOLÁIN
tomato sauce, 1 ½ oz beef marrow. You reduce the wine to half with the shallot and pepper then add demi-glace and tomato. Boil and strain. Add beef marrow cut into rings and poached in meat stock…” but then, this is a sauce for beef.
It is Saturday morning which means I am just back from my oldest son's basketball game. I love these games. Finally we have reached an age when they actually keep score in sports. I have spent years with different sports that are just for teaching, and everybody gets a trophy at the end because everybody participates. That was well enough but I am happy to finally be at a competitive level as it makes it more exciting for the kids, it also teachers them that you can't win them all.
However… I think you will meet me, some parts of Mommy and of course Cherie… the little black persian.
Informed Patients
Before I dive in, first a personal note: those of you who stop by regularly (hi mom) may have noticed the looong periods of silence. I'm afraid I go through bouts of the-rest-of-my-life-taking-over, during which no costuming happens. I know you know what it's like, and thank you for coming back whenever I manage to find something to post about. :)
Um, no. I mean, yes. But no, I'm talking about something else. Try again.
Witch Hill is a short but compelling tale. Sedgwick's skill is in the atmosphere and tension that he weaves and the emotions that he invokes. The description of Jamie's fears are heartbreakingly real, making his plight all the more moving. I particularly loved the references to the 'ancient' (depending on which history text you read!) chalk carvings and seventeeth century witch hunts.
1 tbsp clarified butter
What we’re saying is that the garden is beautiful, and that when you see a beautiful garden it makes perfect, rational sense to believe in an owner. And a gardener.
The cast is off! Well kinda…. mostly. Off at home. I am fumbling around from wall to wall and holding onto pieces of furniture as I go by, but I am walking! And I can tell you, it feels good! Damn the pain!
Milk Carton Cottages, Corrugated Castles and a Dancing Tin Can Man… these are just some of the great crafts found in the Recycled Crafts Box. Laura Martin wants to “make every day earth day” and she offers this book full of innovative craft ideas made of solely recycled materials. This book is a great resource for teachers and parents as it includes an interesting history regarding the inventions of; paper, plastic, metal and fabric and discusses how these inventions have contributed to the increasing waste on our planet. Additionally, it suggests great tips on how each of us can make a difference.9. Wangari's Trees of Peace
But, being implacable opponents of Imperialism does not mean adopting the principle "My Enemies Enemy Is My Friend" as so many on the Left have done. It does not mean that we have to see every movement that calls itself "anti-imperialist" as being truly revolutionary, and progressive, and thereby deserving of our support. Indeed, in the Comintern Theses on the National and Colonial Question that is made clear in its statements declaring opposition to Pan-Islamism and other such movements,
Opt 4 ending gender destruction.
Eight chances at love
Q: Why do you like your pajamas?
SD: My husband and I are currently getting ready for a big move to Europe in July! We'll be moving to a small town outside of Trier, Germany, for several years, and I'm looking forward to how the move will impact Classic Bride. I can't wait to team up with some European wedding vendors and I'm hoping to collaborate with a few photographers and style some inspiring photoshoots in some of my favorite European locations...so stay tuned!
Card: Pink card stock
Then you wake up the next morning with bites and then your sweet children wake up covered in bites too and you decide that enough is enough.
Im sooo happy about that.!!! Beeing a part of this talanted team, and i looove sketches!
Look into business cards
IM IN UR PANTZ TWEETIN PITCHERS OF UR JUNK - BRITEBART KAT
We would sit in the sweet meadow grass, our ears buzzing from the symphony of busy bees visiting every flower. They serenaded us as we plucked the white and yellow blossoms and inhaled their heady fragrance. Then, we would pinch the stems and draw out the stamens. Our reward for the delicate technique? An intoxicating bead of nectar we let drip on our tongues.
cbrianwolf@gmail.com
We order instead a Special California rolls with the caviar for the starters then for kids is the yakemishi rice with seafoods for hubby is the salmon teppanyaki and mine was teppanyaki combo with beef and prawns.
(And here I thought "Pop Tarts" were only available on a store shelf!)
Well, I've come across 2 linky parties asking for recipes for things you cook on a busy schedule. Growing Kinders and Clutter Free Classroom are each hosting one. I thought, "Now that's what I need!" So to add to the list I thought I would add my easy go to recipe. I'm not sure that it is exactly a precise recipe as I tend to fall more into the add a little of this or little of that kind of cooking. My family loves it when I experiment. My crock pot is definitely my best friend in the kitchen. There are no exact measurements as I usually throw in what I have.
For anyone planning to attend the City Council meeting where the wet-zoning for the Cigar City Brewing Tasting Room will be voted on this is the pertinent information.Date: Thursday December 2nd Time: 10:30 AMLocation: 315 East Kennedy Boulevard (Downtown)City Hall, 3rd FloorTampa, FL 33602This is a public meeting so anyone may attend and speak if they so choose or just attend to show support. We encourage everyone that has the time to attend. Thanks again for the overwhelming support and well wishes. Win or lose we are humbled by the support from the community and beyond.Cheers,Joey Redner and the CCB StaffIf you are in the Tampa Bay area - or are going to be - think about attending if at all possible. Your support would be greatly appreciated.
A few months ago, a representative from Da Capo Press generously offered to send me a review copy of Gluten-Free Vegan Comfort Food: 125 simple and satisfying recipes from "mac and cheese" to chocolate cupcakes (2012), the latest cookbook authored by Susan O'Brien.* I am not particularly sensitive to gluten, but am always eager to familiarize myself with methods of food preparation that are suitable for the people I know who are gluten-sensitive or -intolerant. And with the assurance of vegan comfort food appeal--in the form of "125 simple and satisfying recipes," in fact--the book aims to do more than just cater to special dietary needs; it intends to feed body, mind, heart, and then some.
So I am thinking of you all day now,
They explore the pentatonic scale that chartacterises so much Chinese music, delve into the story of the Opium Wars which triggered a deep British disrespect of Chinese musical culture and unveil the earliest dubious examples of Chinoiserie in Western Music.
The Victorians tended to ignore Shelley's passionate radicalism, vegetarianism and feminism in favour of his swooning love poetry. The unforgettable Paul Foot here makes a spirited case for the revolutionary poet as socialist figurehead. Excellent, tub-thumping stuff, right down to the great title and iconic cover with red star and dishevelled poet seemingly heading a mob march.
I know you will think I am making this up, but I am not. Saturday I went to mass. I got there early and was just sitting in the car screwing around with the instrument panel in the new car. Anyway, in pulls this HUGE white limo with a few cars behind it. A young girl gets out with very light hair and goes directly into church. The limo and the other cars leave.
All these things made it a great garment, but for me it's greatest feature was two enormous pockets located on the lower inside front of each of the jacket's sides. They were big enough you could stash surprisingly large items in them without being noticeable from the outside. I often used those pockets to carry a magazine, snacks and my Walkman, and it didn't take long for me to realize a sport bottle filled with a giant rum & Coke fit perfectly in there as well (see Fig. 3 below).
The woman who flour-bagged Kim was caught by security and taken away by police.
Early intervention is crucial for children with autism and lending a helping hand is Girija Devi who runs a preschool for autistic kids in Kochi called Punarjani in Panampilly Nagar, which currently has 15 autistic kids in the age groups of two to five and in some cases the kids are even seven years old.
He answered quickly. So I responded as quickly as I could.
Dilate To live long
You should not have to put up a “No Tresspassing” sign in order to keep people off your property. Is the 9th circuit asking us to put a fence around every house in America?
- Cover Girl Eyelights bonus pack: CAD7.47.
Well, I didn't realize the Colony, the Queen, and her world were in danger. You start out talking about a human boy but he disappears after the second sentence. Then it's a lot of description of what she can do. Given that I can change the color of my clothes I'm not sure you want to list that as something magical.
I thought these glasses were cute and reminded me of the fifties, so I tried to keep that theme going in the card. The background paper is called Spiffy. I cut the glasses on my Cameo with a Silhouette Studio file. The background for the glasses and the font were cut with the Nifty Fifties cartridge on my Cricut. I used Glossy Accents on the lenses of the glasses, although it is hard to tell on the picture.
How about winning the ENTIRE Vintage Summer Basics collection by Maja Design. As you might now, the Maja collections are huge! This time it consists of 30 twosided papers that'll give you 60 different patterns with gorgeous vintage feeling.
For the passes, signs, and handshakes are but emblems here below; we’ll not need them in that Great Lodge where we one day hope to go.
South Africa could have been out of sight at the break but for poor goal-kicking, with Pienaar missing four penalty attempts.
Now I am getting ready for a 5 week tour of sorts, through Colombia, Costa Rica and other parts of Central America. Nothing glamorous. Probably no big crowds… just building relationship with some other amazing artists – learning more about community and life in Latin America – singing in people’s houses and maybe writing some new songs. I know this trip will lead to some exciting long term creative partnership and I am also helping to develop a website and online collaboration space for an incredible network of artists…which I look forward to telling you much more about as time goes on. In the mean time, thanks for staying connected. Here are some more fun things I hope you get the chance to check out:
“Forget I said anything then.” Derrek groaned.
That was one of the more irritating revelations of the last few years, that Robert Jordan had died, suddenly, his series incomplete, apparently volumes away from completion. What was the man thinking, dying on us, his loyal fans of almost 20 years! With indignation I read his obituary, despairing that all this work was for nothing, firming even more my resolve to never read an incomplete series.
Some of us have, or will have, more freedom at work. Growing numbers of people telecommute; they no longer have to travel to a physical location each day to work (or go to school). The percentages will likely grow over the next few decades.
The 1970s saw New York lose more than 800,000 residents, almost all of them non-Hispanic whites. This was the first significant population decrease in more than 150 years.
Rugby – Jason Robinson
This is made even more poignant by interviews with survivors, run from a TV set located inside the helicopter. Nearby is a flag draped coffin with wall text that informs the visitor of the ever-increasing death toll. The interviews tell of the sense of comradeship and belonging in the face of danger. As one of the soldiers recounts, "War was everywhere, an imminent peril pressing on the soul."
Do true feelings ever define boundaries
363 6th Street, San Francisco, CA - January 29, 1966
All night she was coughing up blood and sweating with the fever. On many occasions she screamed in pain just reaching for a glass of water. We all wished there was something we could do to help, but there wasn’t. Either way she was going to become the un-dead. I only wished it happened quicker for her, going through all those symptoms seemed like torture. And when there is not a damn thing you can do, it starts to become heavy on the heart. In fact I debated about putting in how she turned for a long time, but in the end I decided that although it hurts; it happened and maybe by writing this out I can make it easier for whoever reads this.
Therefore, there should be understanding on both sides of the alcohol argument. Those who do not drink should recognize that there is nothing sinful in the consumption of alcohol. Those who drink should recognize that there are legitimate reasons to not drink. Being proud that one abstains or partakes shows immaturity on both sides. And remember what Paul teaches in Romans 14:14, I know and am persuaded in the Lord Jesus that nothing is unclean in itself, but it is unclean for anyone who thinks it unclean.
Things You’ll Need:
So, which will it be and why?
Last Sunday, I had this post about showing a picture from another photographer. It all started because I have accumulated credits for writing blog articles at Dreamstime. I want to make use of the credits and what better ways to use them than to download pictures from other photographers or illustrators. Those photos I can use for writing articles in this blog. The challenge is to write something about those pictures.
relations are mobilized. These indexes, in an animistic way, are even
Then I saw her adorable kitchen with Mr & Mrs Santa Claus and the adorable gingerbread cookies. OMGosh this lady has talent. Her attention to detail is amazing. I just couldn't stop scrolling down and looking at older post's because I just had to see what else she has done. And I was not disappointed. Her house is beautiful and just filled with Southern Charm with a classy edge. I have recommended blogs to you before but this one is a must see. And if you are stuck for decorating ideas this year, you won't be after a visit with Becca at Adventures In Decorating. Click HERE to visit her and her beautiful home.
Than the high cloudlets in the sky.
Be sure to visit ...a place to share to see the scrumptiousness Torrie created this week, a slow cooked chicken and mushroom pot pie. (Apparently, we are channeling each other in both attitude and food choice. =)
What I want to know is, where are all of the so-called permissive parents every morning when their kids are getting up and going to school? Who is telling their kids what to do (go to school), setting clear rules (must go to school) and goals (finish school)? I'm willing to bet it's the parents.
Day 16... is that right?: Porta Potties (Funny thing, and it wasn't intentional, I'll be posting about Pee at my group blog today. In case you don't get enough bathroom humor from this post.)
That night Ruben and I went home and immediately started researching Down Syndrome. Ruben had already said many times how it would still be a blessing. He kept encouraging me. And I kept crying. He prayed. And I kept mourning. But slowly, somewhere between that appointment and the appointment 24 hours later with the specialist, my heart softened to this child I was carrying who, in my mind, was sure to have Down Syndrome. I always knew I would love the baby anyway, but I think you have to mourn the loss of the child you thought you were having.
Then they said, "That will put him closer to two, which is what we generally want to be at before we go with that kind of bracing." Oh? Oh? Because typical kids are pulling up to stand at less than one, and my kid is desperately trying to pull to stand and he can't, and standing and perspective are important for learning and development, so I really don't get the need to wait until he is two, or even two-ish. Here's what I think it is - two things: 1) We go to Shriner's where care is provided at no cost to families. This is great, but not the reason we go there - we go there because we thought/think they are the specialists in this field for kids. But, I think they hold off on some bracing in order to not have to replace it as often. 2) Because they have created a standard - everybody at two - and they are not looking at Charlie as an individual. This pisses me off, frankly. So, that didn't get done, and we got a date for a surgery I don't want Charlie to need, but which should have been done already if he did need it.
Total Cost: $10
“Adam,” he replied confidently.
“Halo is a pretty cool guy. Eh kills people and doesn’t afraid of anything.”
So the charts for the United Kingdom show Vancouver based Radical Entertainment has created an international hit. The game opened to a less sales then the initial Prototype but it had more then enough Oomph to topple the leader Witcher 2.
– gold nails of too-sweet milkiness
Cortisone – Hormone from adrenal glands. Widely used in medicine. Alternatives: synthetics.
Well anyway, I better go and finish up my lunch and get outside before it rains. Stay tuned for more Eurovision blog posts from me in the coming days and weeks. The contest itself is now only a month away and the excitement is building =)
Anyway, I’m going to try tackling the appearance changes and details of the site this weekend. So, please stay tuned until later this weekend and enjoy your Friday!
The story starts off with only Daichi and Hana as the main characters and slowly more and more are introduced. They are introduced in a way that you can tell, "Oh they will probably be part of the main cast," however it's not super in your face about it and the addition comes naturally. The only character whose introduction felt a little too, "BAM! In your face!" was Rinka Himeji's with her just breaking down a door and announcing herself.
On another occasion at a very good hotel as I was waiting at the pass to take some meals, something in my peripheral vision caught my eye.I saw the Chef de Partie who was doing starters drop a cooked Quail on the floor,glance furtively sideways, then pick it up,dust if off with his oven cloth,then go ahead and compile the finished dish.The Head Chef clocked this at the same time that I did.It was a Saturday night,the kitchen were up the wall, checks were piling on and tempers were frazzled.The proverbial wire was about to snap.Cooking another dish would have meant discarding the rest of the starters(which were ready to go) and the main courses which had already been put on to cook to coincide with the starters being finished.This restaurant had 2 rosettes.The Head Chef knew Id seen it.It was face off at the pass.He held my gaze steadily and through gritted teeth,lips unmoving in a straight, thin white line hissed 'if you don't take it they'll have to wait another 20 minutes and the whole of the rest of the night will be a total f**k up and it'll be your fault and YOU'RE THE ONE WHO WILL TAKE THE FLACK'
I love that you try to smile when I take your photo,
Gone With A Handsomer Man
(407): I need a secretary to manage my drinking schedule.
When she ran out of patience, she headed out over the valley.
And we left with the same number of people as we arrived with, which was fortunate given the animal attack and Amanda's risky behavior.
May hear if he listens aright.
For a first time visitor in New Zealand, the above places are suggestions to give you an overall sight of the country. You can do more later on the next visit and I feel sure you would want to come back!
WTFA: Wet The Furniture Again
9- Nerc MST Radar Facility Capel Dewi, Carmarthenshire, Wales, United Kingdom
Have some fun; we cannot wait to see all of your recipes!
3) Does the author’s idea of looking for your own examples and his three reasons for it make sense? Why?
I wanted to take a moment to share a praise with you. Not only have I been so blessed by many of you who have greeted me and welcomed me back to work after my surgery, but I have had the opportunity to share more of God's story with you.
RAW POWER AT TAOSOUND:
*attend the parent group meeting
Level 3: It feels good, but is not good for you, not good for others and does not serve the greater good
Things have been happening, though:
Ang’s constant pursuit of knowledge and self improvement are traits he has inculcated in his children. He is quick to admit, however, that despite being able to provide a privileged life for his family today, in no way are his children having it easy.
Sometimes habitual “hypothetical thinking” can be a bit like an illusionary “Magical Mystery Tour” on a carousel. If it’s positive hypothetical thinking, maybe it’s like one of those wonderful, smoothly flowing, colorful horses…an exaggerated illusion, but still pleasant. If it’s negative hypothetical thinking…well, maybe a beat up, damaged horse with a few splinters or spots of grease and a bumpier ride.
Not what do I want, I know that.
Chocolate shavings or curls for decoration (optional)
gonna build a brand new nation
The issue is less crucial for someone like Jonathan Gold who, over the last few years, has appeared to have largely shed his anonymity. Once a critic goes public, they are fair game for the press. Publishing a photo of the new New York Times critic Sam Sifton, however, is an entirely different story. Not only is Sifton anonymous, Eater apparently lied in wait for him while he was eating in order to sneak a photo, prompting Sifton to label them the "geek paparazzi." And kudos go out to Lee Klein and our own Irene Virbila for managing to completely avoid Eater's prying eyes.
In the meantime, I thought I'd just blog about the process.
Gouramis and the reflections. They were a lovely sight in their blue world.
I’ve really been MIA from blogland lately. I wish I could say it was because I was off having the time of my life but that would be a big old lie. I’ve been spending my spare time hanging out with this….
x-rayed and minutely as she sees mechanisms in every clock, in every
Pfeiffer, in his new exhibition at MC, presents more thwarted mass moments in the form of photographs and four video works. The overall effect of the show is a bit disjointed, at times very recognizable and ordinary and at other times fresh and evocative. Pfeiffer, however, expands his already intense critique of technological culture and how it gets bound up in older rituals we sometimes don’t know we are still inacting.
If it’s clean, mended and paid for you don’t have to be ashamed.
Recipe soon.
PM Lee now promised Singaporeans that the rate of immigration will be continued in a “measured and calibrated” manner. Is this a tacit admission that the uncontrolled influx of immigrants between the years 2003 – 2008 had been a mistake?
At the same time, I'll admit that I'm not entirely qualified to say what I'll be saying here. My kids can use the toilet though I often say that my boys are stormtroopers - amazing shooters who seem to hit everything except the target. I understand that there are other people out there with far less fortunate circumstances and I'm aware that I haven't walked in their shoes.
On one last note, I know I tweeted (twitted, twat…?) about a story I had found on the NYTimes but I wanted to post it again as it is really worth a read. Life Interrupted is a blog by a young woman, Suleika Jaouad, diagnosed with cancer and her reflections on that experience. She also posts a video blog and has a twitter feed that you can follow as well. It’s really quite inspiring.
How about a WOYD(og)W? My poor baby is sporting this rather fetching sparkly pink outfit atm after having a OP last week - cant say she is looking overly impressed about it, or maybe she is just practicing her Naomi Campbell pout....
Jesus died for us so that we could live, He took our place and He died for our sins. We should trust in Jesus because He died for us, He is our great physician. If you think you need a doctor with a lot of experience for your “problem” then you can go to Jesus because He is our great physician. We should trust in Jesus even if your doctor says you need a psychotropic drugs then go to Jesus instead. We should trust in Jesus as our savior.
All Men in this World having for their Constituent parts a Mortal Body, and an Immortal Soul, are passing out of this Life into another: Out of this, because of the Mortality of the Body; into another, because of the Immortality of the Soul. And all both good and bad are daily and hourly travelling to an everlasting and unchangeable state, whose Bodies shall be quickly turned into lifeless dust, and their Souls enter into Heaven or Hell, and be with God or Devil, in Joy or Torment, when they come to their Journeys end; and according to the way they now walk in, so it will be with them for ever: Those that walk in the way chalked out by God, at the end of this Life shall have the end of their Faith, and Hope and Holiness, the Salvation of their Souls; but those that walk after the flesh, and the ways of sin, shall find Hell to be at the end of their walk. Therefore it is of Infinite concernment to all, to observe and do what is prescribed in the Text . . .
There was a bit of a gap between the firebox and the drywall around it when they pulled off the trim. You can see here that they ended up installing some luan that covers that gap and gave me a good surface for the tile.
So hop on over and join the fun. This is a two week challenge. Remember, if you use a TSB image you get entered 2 times for the drawing!!
Jay Hutchinson, New Zealand artist.
God so loved the world, that he gave… John 3:16
Every day during his years and years working at Norwalk Hospital, he and another doc would share the NYTimes crossword puzzle: whoever got to the docs' lounge first would photocopy the puzzle, put the copy in the other doc's pigeonhole, and take the original for himself.
or is it love and is it crime
But these days, the stores are going overboard. Honest mistakes have been criminalized. Intent is meaningless and seems to have no place in the justice process anymore.
Me: (unable to function due to hysterics) ...
Wonder why there’s no equivalent verb for being a wife…
How far we have run
If you already purchased the 3-month tutorial, you will automatically get this tutorial in your e-mail first week of March. Be sure to check your e-mail and to put my e-mail in your safe list in order for you to get your tutorial promptly.
3. I used mini tart pans for easy gifting, but you could use a mini bread pan as well.
I finally hit 40 pounds lost. I did not count it as 'real' until I weighed in twice over 5 days.
I have had one MRI, and about half of the turmor died. So that's REALLY GOOD NEWS!!! There is a lot of swelling so the doctors couldn't see exactly was that wanted, and I am having one at the end of May. I also decided to the do treatment at MD Anderson in Houston. I loooooved the doctor there. He took the time to get to know me, talk to me about my emotions, and overall they seemed a lot more knowledgable. I will continue treatment at Emory too. They will still call the shots, and I will go there every 2 months.
As soon as both the F1 and DTM race-calendars will be confirmed by the FIA, the Porsche race-dates will be known as well !
“Mine, mine…this is what I’ve always wanted,” he thought as he began to embrace fatherhood.
Dare
Best of luck with your choice.
‘Even though the professionals thought it was hopeless, I knew it would make me feel better if I had at least tried to get the baby to turn. So, I spent several sessions a day lying on the floor with my pelvis raised on cushions. After a week or so without progress I consulted Ilana Machover, whose National Childbirth Trust antenatal classes I had attended during my first pregnancy. She immediately suggested that crawling might help and arranged an appointment to show me how to do it. Learning to do the exercise properly proved more difficult than I expected, but once I was crawling to Ilana’s satisfaction I found it a curiously relaxing activity and crawled around the living room several times a day.
"Healing Time" has a couple of name guest stars in Cloris Leachman and Malcom-Jamal Warner. Ms. Leachman's subplot, about a cantakerous, demanding patient who abuses the nursing staff led to a nice little speech by title character Christina Hawthorne, "Nurses are not servants. They are professionals. They should be treated with respect." Right on, superladynurse on a mission! No seriously, I loved that.
The City of Torrance is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. Applicants with disabilities who require special arrangements must contact the above-named personnel prior to testing/interview.
The Hawks spent the latter part of the fifties through around 1964 as backing back for rockabilly legend Ronnie Hawkins, who took the combination of young Canadians and one transplanted southerner under his wing, worked them hard and turned them into some of the finest musicians known to the world.
Lost an hour of sleep and I think we all felt that loss keenly. Especially those who spent much of last night with 10 other people, stuffed into one of the tiny bedrooms, accompanied by a bottle of whisky and another of vodka. (I wasn't one of those people BTW but they could be identified this morning by the green hue of their gills and the capacious bags under their eyes.)
This Devil's Due miniseries was primed up to be an excellent addition to the storyline, not only filling in the events regarding Laurie Strode's supposed death and transformation into Keri Tate, but also offering insight into her as a character. It was admittedly a bit disheartening to see good girl Laurie stray to the dark side, but what traumatized teenager wouldn't? We already know that she turns into a "functioning alcoholic" by the time H20 rolls around, so this seems a believable beginning to her downward slide.
So my husband thinks I am a freak of nature for even doing this...but, we are moving in a month, and I had alot of time on my hands at work last night...SO, while I only had one patient to take care of...I virtually organized my future kitchen. :) Megan, from Honey We're Home wrote her 15 Tips For an Organized Move, which I have been referencing as I begin packing. She was actually the inspiration behind my extreme organization...so you can thank Megan for my insanity :)
Czar, in coming up empty, made sort of an anti-theme haiku (for lack of a better description). Making the jump between perspiration and inspiration was brilliant (I thought). And I think the new word "haikuless" may make Webster's next year.
When Marge was especially hard up I'd lend him cash to right himself and then join him sitting outside for the evening as the coins rolled and bounced our way. I wasn't there to beg or because I needed money, I accompanied Marge as he wouldn't work the evenings alone yet needed to to repay me. So I was there as a kind of lowly guarantee that he wouldn't be assaulted or have his drawings kicked and stomped into the ground. Not that I ever stopped much. I only sat out with him maybe ten times and most of them we were spat at or a bottle would shatter against the wall behind us. Only once were we physically attacked. Marge freaked out and pulled a dirty syringe on one of the drunken yobs and ended up getting arrested. The truth is I wasn't there to protect Marge, or I was, but only so as he remained healthy enough to beg what he owed me. I knew if I didn't escort him out and babysit him I'd never see my money again. I'm not sure if Marge ever realised that I was the lead ball weight on the end of his chain. If he did, he never objected.
Why is it that I take such great pleasure from the simplest things in life? And could really care less about material things? I had all that material stuff once. And walked away from it.
Finally, here's a look at the tower with added dormers and railings on the top lookout. I'll twist and age all that too.
“Well, not with you caterwauling over there, I haven’t!” When Briana’s smile faltered a little, he added, “I’m teasing. It was very pretty. Come on, have a seat and keep me company. It’ll be awhile before all the fish come back, anyway.”
The thing is, the plot twists aren’t important. Anyone who’s watched a few horror movies (or glanced at the DVD box) can guess what mysterious object Jane is hiding in her freezer. Macabre is a deeply disturbing film because it shows us so little. In one perplexingly hair-raising scene, little Lucy applies heavy makeup to her face, changes her clothes, and eavesdrops on her father arguing over the phone with Robert about Jane’s behavior. This is scary because no one knows what Lucy did. No one knows she drowned her little brother, and no one knows what she’s going to do next.
WATCH THE MELTING SNOWMAN ACTIVITY
Some random eBooks:
I do very little with house plants, inside but these amaryllis are seasonal and after the blooms, the leaves will die back and I can store them down in the well cellar. Perhaps they will rebloom next year. I have a few other amaryllis bulbs given to me by a friend. Some of those rebloom around Easter yearly but they are pink, so these Christmas reds are a welcome change of color.
The oil spill, god i don't want to even bring to mind the fucking insanities that we have witnessed.
Mix the flour , the ground almonds and the sugar with the butter- rub it with your fingers till it's finely crumbled.( I suggest you keep something near you to wipe your hands as inevitably the phone will ring at this stage , most times !).
Ideas:
You might have to reconsider everything you’ve read about conventional healing. The ‘new’ frequencies of healing described by Dr Pearl transcend ‘technique’ entirely and bring you to levels beyond those previously accessible to anyone, anywhere. This book takes you on Eric Pearl’s journey from the discovery of his ability to facilitate healings, to his well-deserved reputation as the instrument through which this process is being introduced to the world. But most importantly, The Reconnection reveals methods you can use to personally master these new healing energies.
What if I screw up? What if I do everything wrong and she turns into some crazy lunatic.
Old Red Wine
I also know that all babies are different, and that for some people things like cry-it-out simply don’t work, either because the baby gets him/herself so worked up that they puke, or the mom/dad gets so upset that it’s just not sustainable. But it worked for us, and I think it’s a perfect illustration of the roots-and-wings theory. Raise your child to be secure in their parent’s love and support and they will have the confidence to do anything. That is my ultimate goal. I also think that sleep is the earliest way of setting boundaries and promoting self-sufficiency, which to me is one of the most important things you can do for your child. This is why I don’t understand or subscribe to attachment parenting, although I’m very interested to read about how it works for other people!
There is also a Forum you can participate in to discuss all aspects of the Telescopes in Schools Program and Astronomy in general. Please register, and participate in the discussions.
I remember completing those assignments, and I remember feeling weird that after I read my book, I had to translate its contents. I would often have an English-Tagalog[1] dictionary with me. It’s not that I did not know the equivalent word, but sometimes it’s at the tip of my tongue, and I still can’t remember it. I wasn’t alone in my English-Tagalog dictionary dependence. All my classmates were like that too. The reason for this was that it was strange for anyone to speak in straight English, as it was to speak in straight Filipino. Almost everyone spoke in Taglish (Mixture of English and Tagalog/Filipino), and so people would switch between these languages depending on which word came to mind.
Because the wood was so old and porous, it sucked up the white spray paint like crazy, so it took A LOT of coats before it finally looked good.
Who can be surprised that young white girls willingly go with these sexual predators who pick them up when so many stagger in and out of pubs and nightclubs in a drunken haze wearing clothes that leave little to the imagination and boasting of ‘blow jobs’ or how many guys they have ‘shagged’?
But it was carpet-cleaning night, which meant that at about ten minutes to close, a crew of guys started dragging in hoses and equipment. They they moved all the booths and tables, stacking them up on top of each other … and still this couple sat. At 12:25 the cleaning crew finally started running their vacuums at ear-splitting volume, and five minutes after that the couple finally left.
From a first hand perspective some parts of the anew Christian life style means that some of your old life style habits have to come to a halt right away so the change process can begin within. But it can become harder for some while others can give up those habits and their sinful thought pattern without much failure… Either way God, is there beside you encouraging your spiritual change as well He’s, also there to encourage you when you make a mistake or even stumble upon a road block for you to get back up and brush off the knees and press forward…
For YA authors, this is a) wonderful and b) absolutely terrifying. Because when teenagers don't like your books, they say so. And we cry.
4. Antena - Les Demoisells De Rochefort
Here's just really, really short synopsis of how she found this latest trouble. No, I really mean it. This story won't take long at all, so hold on to your britches and keep reading.
And when offer it as an impetratory Sacrifice, we must actually request something in general or particular; otherways we let the credit of the Son of God, which is communicated to us, remain useless and unprofitable. For as we all want merits which might find credit with God, we must not omit to offer those which Christ gained by the Sacrifice he offered on the Cross, which he has given to us, and they are applied and communicated to us by the Sacrifice of the Altar.
I know it has been very long since I last post on this blog. I do apologize for not saying good bye but it was kind of hard to do so and as the days and weeks and month went by I just did not have the time to come back and update the blog on a regular basis. Besides life has been crazier than ever in Haiti.
*In the coming posts I will list specific prayers from the 7 Steps to Freedom.
Is your manuscript being self-published because you’ve been sending it round to publishers for years and failed to sell it anywhere else? (Muse: warning bells should be ringing!)
Due to the nature of how iOS push notifications are invoked by Sparrow Push, your iPhone’s battery life shouldn’t be affected more than it would be when running the stock Mail app with push turned on.
To cheer everyone up in this mad world of sales and sub-zero temperatures, here's another house favourite here at Dolores Delargo Towers, the eternally vivacious Kessler Sisters!
You may also be complaining to yourself that none of this stuff goes any way towards answering the question of why we kiss under the mistletoe at Christmas. I seem to remember there was something about Pagans and Druids, but the thing is, we were far too interested in the Norse myths to get distracted by the small matter of the reason we were looking at them in the first place. Look, you're all pretty internet-savvy. You know where Google is.
The nine books entrusted to the Nine Unknown contain information on
He was instrumental in setting up TI-M, an NGO dedicated to fighting corruption.
So, I walked into a fellow teacher’s room this past fall where we gather to eat lunch and announced to my pals, “I have a great Vickie story!” I plopped myself down and took out my yogurt , shook my head and rolled my eyes. “This is all your fault. You won’t even believe what I did.” But before I begin to tell you the details of the events that could truly only happen to me, I need to back up a bit.
The groups music inspired the recent popular musical and movie “Mamma Mia“. Bjorn Ulvaeus and Benny Andersson, who composed all the music of ABBA, participated in the development of the musical along with playwright Catherine Johnson.
Luke 22:25-26 Jesus said to them, “The kings of the Gentiles lord it over them; and those who exercise authority over them call themselves Benefactors. But you are not to be like that. Instead, the greatest among you should be like the youngest, and the one who rules like the one who serves.”
The Sentiment is from Close to My Heart, a RAK from B.....
In this regard, Bidmead’s approach works better with Romana. Lala Ward’s at once imperious and elfish presence is perfect, and she’s the best thing on offer here, once again stepping into the secondary Doctor role that has been increasingly carved out for her. She boggles and charms and throws people off-guard, not clowning but conniving. Her scene as she steps out of the TARDIS to deal with the slavers is pure Troughton.
I debated about whether to post this because I think you're flailing here. Time to get out of the water, dry yourself off, have a martini and think about diving in again when you've had time to get some perspective.
a more intimate and intuitive relationship will be the result,
No doubt, Albert Pujols is great. His numbers prove him to be one of the greatest baseball talents to ever play pro ball. I get that…I agree with that. But that isn’t the context in which this question is asked.
The prayed the court to declare the letter issued on January 2 as illegal and direct respondent to comply court order of December 13, 2011.
And made the gables laugh.
My hunt is now on for a sling that will support both him and me, which is going to be fun. I had a look in my local newspaper/ baby information magazines and there appeared to be a local slingmeet group. Brilliant, I thought! Then – after a little bit of fruitless phoning, searching around for where this group met, I came to a bit of a screeching halt. It doesn’t actually exist anymore. I was so fed up! I wanted to join it because they had a sling library, which would have been wonderful for me.
One thing I’ve noticed from a lot of the mail is that SR and OOO have started to bleed together in many people’s minds. For example, Meillassoux is sometimes being referred to as an “object-oriented philosopher,” which isn’t true. So, for those who are new to this part of the blogosphere, here is a renewed summary of what the different terms mean.
Something Shiny Syndrome.
Ruminate on all that for another thirty seconds.
Day by day though, with a little coaxing, a lot of patience, and huge amounts of treats, they started to take food from our hand, come toward us when we went in the paddock and staring a little less fearfully. The major advance was when we managed to get their collars on them, not an elegant manoeuvre, but we can now handle them and, importantly, get them on a lead to take them to the meadow. Walking your goats in the meadow is a wonderful thing to do on a warm sunny winter’s day; less so in gales and rain, but a goat needs their pasture, as well as their bonding.
Still locked up in his little barn,
The Crown Heights Farm Share folks came by the CHCA meeting tonight (additional updates coming soon) to announce the opening of their registration for the summer of 2012. They've expanded their options this year - in addition to tasty veggies from Sang Lee Farms, they also offer fruit, cheese, butter, and yogurt shares - and they're looking to expand the size of the CSA, too (in years past, it filled up very quickly). They've also got subsidized shares and pay-as-you-go plans available for those who qualify, so if the up-front costs sound like a lot, there are ways to work around it.
The Triple Steak Stack is a delicious master piece of meat & cheese, period. It’s cost $7.00 plus tax and it’s worth every cent of it. If you have nothing for dinner, in the mood for steak and just got paid by all means get this sandwich. I try to be fair here people, but the only good thing Taco Bell ever had was the Baja Blast (look it up), now they have the Triple Steak Stack which not only is a fast food contender, but could possibly be the champ.
Dad has four more siblings left. They were pretty freaked at Uncle Jeremy's funeral. Twice is a coincidence. Three times makes it true. Once some time had passed, though, the old Shalako humour started seeping through.
Mom never answered. This has always been her way. She finds one remedy and she sticks to it obsessively. Loyally. Like a soldier to her cause. It becomes THE cure-all.
Up for grabs this week is this beautiful Penny Black stamp from
For fun, I took pictures last week on my drive home. As I drove. At between 45 and 55 miles per hour. Yes, I know. Jeffrey was cringing and wincing when I showed him the photos. But, I really didn't look at the camera even once. Well,only once. Here are some unedited pictures from the drive. I thought they turned out kind of cool. It's just a slice of my daily life.
For the record, I did not mean to make my cards with similar layouts! The first card I have to show you uses Together Silhouettes. Love this set! I went with reds for my main color. I actually “broke” the sentiment up by masking out what I didn’t want on the front as…
the one is on the top
Ethel at the Gordon Street home with "Nipper". I can only guess the date.
‘The beginning of wisdom is found in doubting; by doubting we come to the question, and by seeking we may come upon the truth’.
Abraham Foxman’s ADL acquiesced
On bench.
6. Do not do any high-impact exercising or jumping with a carrier on, that’s just asking for trouble.
Here is the fruits of our Summer 2011 potato bucket!! We harvested them at the end of October.
It also has a somewhat oily feel, but again, once it is spread out skin absorbs it quickly and the oily feeling goes away.
My penchant for fibro and tin, wood paneling, and the faded flywire of that beach shack may have faded over the years, but my ideology over my dream holiday house remains the same. Its not so much what it looks like, as what it does to you. When I find that dream piece of land…. I’ll remember that.
"At the center of life's storms I stand serene."
Oxford exams are really that big. Exams generally are a pretty big deal, being Asian and all…
who wasn’t so much of an eyeful.
Since her first trip to Dublin, she has become involved in a campaign to Save Moore Street and preserve it as a National Monument. These are the houses where the leaders of the 1916 Rising took shelter when they had to evacuate the GPO and where they made the decision to surrender. It is hoped to create an interpretive centre out of the houses.
It’s been some years now, since he left the service and was last saluted.
EDUCATION:
Still, we don’t have a coat, and still I want to pull my hair out….
LC: I do have an idea for a third book that, while being about a different character in a different situation, would tie together some of the characters in Mistwood and Nightspell. But it's on the back burner for now while I work on other projects, so I don't know for sure whether it will ever be finished and published.
It is obviously a quiet time for the Press and Media. The snow and ice have gone, at least for the time being, and life is returning to some sort of normality. The obvious exception is Northern Ireland, where burst pipes have reduced the flow of water to a trickle, but if they managed to survive thirty years of the IRA and the UDF, bombing and shooting their way to the negotiating table, they can survive anything. To fill the quiet time, the Press and Media have targeted the violent death of Joanna Yeates, a Bristol girl found strangled and dumped in woodlands over Christmas. In the normal course of events, this would hardly merit a by-line, but with little else to report, it has become headline news……
I miss you like you’re mine.
I'll start off with a little history about the bridge and it's importance in terms of a crossing point. The bridge was built around 1530 which is a real testament to those who slaved away to put this bridge in place. Dairsie bridge was part of the original route between Cupar and St. Andrews. I believe Guardbridge was built in a similar time period but the use of the current A91 as a route between the two towns wasn't established till later on.
Consider the 1961 statement of US President John F. Kennedy (JFK) before media personnel:
Sylvia also gave each of us two stitch wallets that she made herself! The first one I opened was made from Kate Spain's Flurry fabrics. Remember those quilt blocks I was working on back in December...well, I dug them out to photograph with my wallet.
Like I’m having to live now.
So this weird bleeding seemed to me like a one-off. Nothing to worry about.
Like really, do you have ANY idea how blabby he is? The preachiness was bad enough, having to sit there and listen to his EIGHT MILLION AND SEVEN spontaneous sermons to no one in particular about the power of the Light and the need to work together against a common foe, and blah blah blah. But then he started going on for hours on end about his crazy uncle Lucius who used to live down the block from Andorhal, and thought he was King Llane, and caught Deadeye burning down a dwarf settlement in Loch Modan and forced him to retreat by beating him at Parcheesi, until he finally went off the deep end and painted himself blue and spent all his time running around Tirisfal Glades naked chasing bats with a wooden spatula, until the Kirin Tor snapped him up and locked up away in some padded room in Dalaran just to keep him out of trouble for his own good, and now Tirion feels like my day just won’t be complete until he tells me what kind of marmalade he liked to put on his toast in the morning, and I just couldn’t fucking TAKE it anymore.
7. Everyday Will Be Like A Holiday
Asked if he will be intereste d when offered a fresh contract this summer Silva said: “What I’m thinking about is the next match on Sunday. I’ve got two years left on my contract and I’ve always said I’ll be happy to stay here. I’m not thinking of an extension to my contract at the moment.”
"Fat Tire is actually one of the first craft beers I ever had," Jeremy says, recalling his own epiphany. "I was about 19 years old, and I was (managing) this band in college. We were out in Boulder and we played at this little restaurant where the manager told us if he saw us drinking any beer he'd break our hands, but we could have a gig here. But meanwhile, we were drinking Fat Tire in the back room, and I'm like 'This stuff is great.' I'd just gone a year into college, where all you were drinking was Natty Light, and suddenly for the first time, I had Fat Tire."
Ooooopsie! Cussing on stage? No, no. There we go, come on cry cry cry - you know you want to!
mix it in to oatmeal, granola, smoothies....really, it goes with anything.
Can't Take a Hint by The Western Starlanders
I will keep you all posted.
These two creeds do not disagree with each other. The Nicene Creed adds theological reflection and clarification to the Apostles’ Creed. So we could call the Nicene Creed a fully developed version of the Apostles’ Creed. For example where the Apostles’ Creed says, “I believe in Jesus Christ his only Son, our Lord…” the Nicene Creed says:
The championship match of the inaugural bracket of the Fantastic Reviews Battle of the Books pits Eyes Like Leaves by Charles de Lint against Range of Ghosts by Elizabeth Bear. I've read to page 200 of both books (a little more than halfway through both), and the championship of the Winter Bracket goes to the book I most want to continue reading to the end. The winner will be featured in a full review at Fantastic Reviews (we'll also try to arrange an interview with the author), and will be eligible for the overall 2012 Battle of the Books Championship at the end of the year.
The Pro’s, those that heard of the fund drive for new tree’s, gave. Some of them didn’t. In two cases I discovered they had never been in the cemetery at all, either with the old trees, or now with the planting going on – but they had an opinion.
Here's the thing: Louise Brooks had good reason to understand the motivation of a girl who would kill the man who molested her. When she was just nine years old, Louise was sexually abused by a local pervert in her hometown of Cherryvale, Kansas. From then on, she was cold to sexual love and felt nothing for the many men who fell in love with her in Hollywood, Europe and beyond.
First-time author James Renner (The Man from Primrose Lane) uses Star Wars figures to explain the process of getting an agent and then a publisher, and then having your print books appear in bookstores. (The author is R2D2. Han Solo is the reader, the most important person in the chain.)
SPAM POEMS consist of things bots leave me on my blog or in my email. I rewrite their gibberish into my own gibberish! Have fun there are always more of these to share :D
Now, I also want you to know—all of you to know—the angelic realm, all of us, are not part of that twelve dimensions, twelve planes of human existence. We are a realm beyond that. Now, do you experience us, as you are in human form, within that bubble, that existence realm? Yes.
I give him that chance
Chiquitita
KEVIN VAN HENTENRYCK: You know, I had a couple experiences early on, that I'm sure affected me. When I was very young I went to the Michigan State Fairgrounds. I went to meet girls. But there was a triple bill under the tent this one night and the first act was Bob Seger, but not the Silver Bullet Band It was before. Then it was Alice Cooper's band, but they were just awful and everyone left. Then Mitch Ryder and the Detroit Wheels came on and everyone came back and the tent was jumping. Another time I was dating this girl, and we went to see Ted Nugent and the Amboy Dukes at this VFW hall in west Detroit, and the stairs had these ramps on them. So we walked in, and the whole place was filled with members of the Hells Angels motorcycle gang and their motorcycles. We were the only non-bikers there. They gave us a hard time, but after a few minutes they left us alone. It was a good time. So I must have be influenced by Detroit.
Asset Transactions 14
Here's an example Willie Randolph the Hall of Fame bound World Series winning player and coach (shamelessly fired last month by the Mets. punks.) Not only played High School ball at Samuel J. Tilden in East Flatbush, but when I was there on the baseball team in the 80s his uniform (from 1972) was still in use. Trivia! Feel the enlightenment!
No, the house won't be clean when I leave for Utah, but hopefully my illness will have abated because I didn't stick to my schedule.
PS, sorry my blogging is sparse to say the least, but summers are so short here in Calgary, so most of my tine is spent outside while there is no snow or rain....hopefully I'll post something new by Sundy, but don't hold your breath!
It's winter-like.
Housing prices are rising mostly due to demand driven by immigration along with real estate speculation from Asians and Russian petro-dollars (and allegedly Asian and Russian criminal organisations looking to launder their money). However incomes are not keeping apace. Immigrant incomes are low and slow to increase in a time where real incomes have remained stagnant. Immigrants are able to secure a mortgage because of low interest rates, liberal mortgage standards, and a belief housing prices will keep rising. But how long can this last?
And behind curtains, in unfamiliar windows,
How Champ knew to ﬂee that ﬁghting environment is a mys- tery. Why she sought refuge on Sue’s porch is as well. But one thing is clear: this pit bull puppy chose love—just as Sue did by taking her in. Those choices blessed them with each other and changed both their lives forever.
Red Faction Armageddon might be worth a play through if you’re really interested in the fiction but for most people I’d say there are better games in the genre to play.
20-something: I wouldn’t be caught dead going to a movie or restaurant alone.
Imagine all the heartfelt praises
UPDATED with full text of statement
Harviestoun Ola Dubh 12yo 330ml $10.00 - Amazingly complex imperial porter, aided by maturation in the highly acclaimed Highland Park distillery's whisky casks.
6.possession
Plaintiff
3. Social conflict. Paul’s major emphasis in this list is on those acts of the sinful nature which cause social conflict. He lists eight such acts: hatred, discord, jealousy, fits of rage, selfish ambition, dissensions, factions and envy. Since the NIV translation provides a clear and accurate rendering of each term, there is little need for expanded discussion of their meanings. Some terms are roughly synonymous, such as jealousy and envy. It seems that Paul added more terms under this category of social conflict because this was the area of greatest need in the Galatian churches. The attitudes and actions that destroy personal relationships were the most evident manifestation of the sinful nature in those churches. We can see reflections of this problem of social conflicts in verses 15 and 26 as well: Christians were “biting and devouring each other” and “provoking and envying each other.” The Galatian churches were divided into bitterly antagonistic factions. The rest of the letter indicates that these conflicts were caused by the false teachers’ campaign to enforce the observance of the law in the churches. The curse on “all who rely upon observing the law” (3:10) was already being experienced in the tragic breakdown of relationships between Christians. While they concentrated on performing “works of the law,” their lives were characterized by the “works of the flesh,” especially these eight in the area of social conflict.
Category: Cooking - Cakes
So my evening, from about 4:30 till 6 has been revision. Of everything in one subject. Yawn. And then I did another 40 minutes – 1 hour of more revision, of another subject. I haven’t stopped, all evening. I had a break at 6 though, to watch The Simpsons. It was a rubbish episode.
Possessing a glass of milk ahead of each meal can help you to get rid of fat. Drinking milk immediately ahead of your meal will develop a feeling of fullness, which may avoid you from overeating. Milk is additionally loaded with calcium that can help preserve bones robust, along with build some muscle mass.
warming up to that”.
Soft Cover. Bound. Size 6″ X 3 ¼”.
Sometimes I'll even copy and paste so I'm sure it's 100 percent.
7. Until now (March 26, 2012) EXO fandom does not have the color and the official name of the fandom, but netizens gave the name to his fans Exotic (unofficial).
Clouds descend
I am learning to grasp the both/and side of my journey rather than either/or. In the past I would get grouchy because of the “to know and follow hard after you” part of the song because my narrow yet inclusive view had all the emphasis on what God is doing, as if there is no value in following him. Following the One who is embracing you allows you to have confidence in this journey and also time to relax and simply enjoy being who you are. It also allows for growth and not simply coasting. I love that I don’t have to worry about “getting it right” but get to enjoy the music along the way.
February 29, one of our closest friends, Horacio Boy Morales, died. He had been in coma for three months, following a heart attack.We still feel the aching void that he has left in our lives.
The monarchy system in Malaysia cannot be obliterated from history even with a two-thirds majority in Parliament unless the rulers themselves give their consent. It will take a radical and communal revolution to depose the rulers. This will not happen – not in the conceivable future.
Comment #895 - Isabel Almeida (confirmed)
71. Due to precipitation, for a few weeks, K2 is taller than Mt. Everest.
As for Pay-What-You-Like, I think it’s a good solution to the need for price-targeting in music sales. Records really do have a different value to different people. I, for example, wouldn’t download a Scouting For Girls album for free, but apparently there are hordes who think differently. I like trusting the consumer to set the price according to their valuation. That said, it is one of an infinitely adaptable set of options in our software and you can release a record for a fixed price of £800, bundle it with a set of PDF scores and then delete it after five downloads if you want to. It’s about treating each release as a unique thing and trying to come up with a pricing strategy accordingly.
You see, This is a perfect example that this is the goal for some Atheists. They want to find reasons to justify denying God. They use excuses all the time here. These are NOT reasons why you do not follow Christ, being in utter contempt towards his followers. It doesn't matter what kind of person I am, be it a liar, murderer, or pure evil what you have is gripes and complaints, and nothing more.
Still with me? Ok, you were warned.. I am feeling EXTREMELY SORRY FOR MYSELF.
There’s nothing quite like the misery experienced in the final moments of a trade show: Your feet hurt, your mind is numb, and your senses offended by the obnoxious booth two aisles down. Walk through an exhibit in its death throes and you’re likely to find a collection of burnt-out sales and marketing reps slumped in chairs or tearing down early.
It's a Pizza Hut, it's all-you-can-eat night, and you take a drink so she has to drive you home (-100)
And then we were out of town all last weekend for Jessica’s wedding, so the last four pears sat on our kitchen counter for about a week longer than they really should’ve.
26 years old: My jewelry, everything from Mike, the Teddy Bear, the Quilt. I haven’t had to think about it in awhile.
and her hottie of a man is a pro sailer (like a sail boat but on crack) with a New Zealand Accent..
I proposed, during the meeting, that we elect a council to run the city so that no ONE person would have the authority over all. Of the seven people present, four wished to have a council and three did not. You’d think that the most basic of rulers would see that a majority of the people wanted a council. It was over ruled by the alderman who held fast to his post as sole ruler and tried to accuse me of an attempt to take power for myself. I don’t see how seeking a council of three, not EVEN wanting to put my name in the running, makes me appear to seek power for myself.
BUT, I give thanks none the less!
I'm sure this mirror
1 unsuccessfully
This brings us to the decision by a federal judge to overturn California’s Proposition 8, calling for a state constitutional ban on gay marriage. Proposition 8 was approved by voters by a margin of 52 percent in favor versus 48 percent who opposed it. The majority of U.S. States have laws recognizing marriage as between members of the opposite sex.
Late in 1933, during a walk through a frozen Moscow with Boris Pasternak, Mandelstam whispered the words to a new poem into his friend's ear:
Mary: "Sir, you had a 10:00 appointment this morning, and didn't show up..."
Here's part of what he wrote back:
If you are not familiar with the Look Good Feel Better galas, they are designed to raise money for breast cancer awareness, and the idea of Look Good, Feel Better is, that if women with breast cancer can be helped to look good, they will feel better, and therefore brighten their spirits both mentally and physically and in turn be better armed to face the disease and fight it. Shoppers brings in makeup artists and skin care specialists and hair stylists offering makeovers and consultations by appointment. There are giveaways, and raffles and a percentage of certain sales goes to Breast Cancer research. I was honored to be invited to take part.
I won’t spill everything now (hence the ‘part 1′), but I’ll get started with something that will surprise some of you, I think. So, how about this?
I felt at peace with the price board, Its better to drink my thirst and eat my hunger.
On May 25th International House World will hold its second online teachers conference as part of the ongoing celebrations for 50 years of IH Teacher Training.
Level 9: Mastery: +28%, Accuracy: +54.
Megan Fox Lite looks through some old crap in the attic and finds some pictures that somehow lead her to this old peoples’ home where she talks to an old lady who refuses to tell them anything at all – until about 10 minutes later into the film; spoilers! Until then, we can contend ourselves with stupid shit happening in the bathroom of a nightclub. Spooky!
For eight long years the United States was ruled by a president many Americans couldn’t stand, who came to office having lost the popular vote, and who displayed a tragic readiness to violate the law in both domestic and foreign policy (remember illegal wiretaps of U.S. citizens, “enhanced interrogation techniques,” covert torture centers, the Valerie Plame leak, and the preemptive use of force?). Yet whatever we thought of his administration’s policies and his actions, we usually didn’t consider his presidency illegitimate, because it was backed up by our government’s core institutions. My compatriots, many of whom were highly critical of the way he ruled, seldom questioned his right to rule.
This is the movement of men, spanned across cultures, lineages, nations and identities. A true movement of men requires nothing less than the shelter of all men from that which would alienate us from ourselves. Be strong. Fight when you must and know when to move on from the fray. Dream. See beauty in the universe. Learn to see and love yourself. You are spontaneously awesome.
Both of these buys are new reissues from a company I'd not heard of before, the curiously named Not Now Music, from that hotbed of popular song, er, West Hampstead. They've done a great job here, so next time I have a few spare shillings, I'll be on the lookout for more.
Protesting AGAINST Israel was something none present took lightly but the current policy of destruction and demolitions must stop. We must not remain silent witnesses to this disgrace.
These two pictures were taken in front of and behind out house Sunday morning. Beautiful and mostly melted by the time we got home from church. The good thing about March snows in Missouri is they they are beautiful for a moment and disappear quickly. Click on picture to see larger view.
The youths, aged between 17 and 20, shouted offensive remarks about soldiers at the white-haired pensioner and then attacked him when he responded.
Yeah, I promised myself I'd exercise self control but, I mean, jeez. Come on. FREE BOOKS. If I didn't take them, somebody else would have!
The one thing I will add though, whichever diet you chose I would strongly recommend steering clear of “ready made” ground raw diets. They do nothing to clean your dog’s teeth (a significant benefit of feeding raw meaty bones) and you are relying on someone else to select the ingredients therefore you know much less about what your dog is eating. Yes they can seem like a convenient and “safer” option but if you select one of the diets above and do a small amount of reading you will become a raw feeding expert in no time and there is tons of help on the internet.
it is Laughton who rules over The Big Clock. In Hollywood movies, most tyrannical managers are openly and loudly abusive. Laughton as Janoth keeps his voice low, forcing subordinates to lean close, which they wouldn't do otherwise. That’s because getting close means they have to look at Janoth’s weedy little moustache and the way he strokes it with one finger, in a gesture as suggestive as it is repulsive. He won't make eye contact, emphasizing his employees' wormlike status. And Laughton speaks every word in an affected, maddeningly casual drawl, underlining that he doesn't give a hoot if he just screwed up someone's life.
The gorgeous birthday girl:
Shaz xxx
CBC
'Monsieur shall be eating no fish nor shellfish and Madame being coeliac'
Although I put this watch prominently on my list, I sort of knew that my family wouldn't go to the trouble to order it. So, this was actually a Christmas present to myself. :) Valerie of Red Vines for Breakfast owns this watch, and ever since drooling over her's in person, I knew that I had to have one . Now I do!
The EPA's harsh new regs were based on California's, the most onerous in the entire country and perhaps the world. Businesses and the most productive citizens are fleeing the state in droves and the 'official' unemployment rate is 12%, 3 points above the national 'official' rate. The real rate is close to 18%.
I'm sure a lot of people find my poetry boring.
Imagine being turned down everywhere you apply for a job – not because of your qualifications, but simply because of who you are. Or imagine not being able to find a home because people can openly discriminate against you for being trans. Imagine being kicked out of restaurants because of who you are. Imagine not even being able to use public restrooms because of who you are. Imagine not being able to find a doctor who’s willing to treat you. That is the everyday reality faced by trans people, and they have no legal recourse against any of this.
Unfortunately, because of the growth of the city - a few of these are no longer visible - so I you've been doing a bit of time-traveling as well.
I love this thing. Big, big thumbs up for the giant womb/eggplant.
in my defense, I didn't know it'd be shiny. I bought wrapping paper to use as the background and didn't realize that it'd be plastic and not paper. false advertisement if you ask me.
The sequence I scrubbed up was ultimately forced to walk the plank in editorial but I'm proud to have a credit on this hilarious film. Go see it- it's a barrel of larfs!
I wanted a paper that wouldn't be too strong for the image to sit in front of.
What if? What was? Or what could be? These are the questions Diego encourages Raine to write about in her time at Sparrow Road. These questions help give the long gone orphans a voice and help Raine find her own.
Accessories - Fleur de Lis border punch, gold embossing powder, 2" ivory satin ribbon, 1/2" ivory satin ribbon, Lg Rectangle Nestabilities, gold swirl clip, Chino pearls (kaisercraft), paper piercer and mat pack.
Released 1986 on Mean Midget Records.
Now pay attention… Throw all of this into a slow cooker or casserole, add the rest of the ingredients and ta-da… Nearly there!
Poetic prose makes this a quick but worthwhile read.
What do I know of this country, other than its’ food and people and shopping malls and clubbing hideouts? Sometimes I think that’s all I do here.
Traditionally, in the magazine and newspaper industry, a kill fee is "a negotiated payment on a magazine or newspaper article that is given to the freelancer if their assigned article is 'killed' or cancelled." (Read the full definition here.) The contracts for the magazine articles I and Ann Crispin wrote for Writer's Digest included kill fees--but that was a few years back, and I suspect they are less common now.
This week was a little bit crazy. But overall, it was still a good week, even if I missed a run. Life happens :)
Daniel was not liked by those who wanted his place. People around him were envious of him and his position with the king, so they moved in to get rid of him. They were caught up in the things of the world. They wanted the prestige and the power that came with the right hand man position of the king. They were willing to do anything to get that position. They did not know God. But sometimes in our day there are people who know God but are so hung up in getting their worldly due they will twist what God has said to ift them and tar others down.
Write your description as if you don't have a photo there. Answer all the questions a buyer may have; what is it made of, how can I use it, how do I care for it? Always add the size of your item, ideally in cm as well as inches. For things like necklaces and bags, having a photo of the item being worn is excellent - a visual is always helpful.
Now, go practice throwing your voice just like the pro!
This week we were given the receipe to use of 3 SQUARES, as first I had no idea how or what to use in this weeks challenge, but after digging out some christmas stamps for another project a bell started to ring and the old brain cells started to work and this is my card for this weeks 3 squares challenge at Simply Less is More ........
DOCTOR ICE HANDS: Sorry about that. I’m going to have to ask you to turn around and bend over.
Kaiser provides each graduate with a certificate showing changes in weight, BMI, and body fat percentage. I’ve already blogged about my weight loss (and other numbers such as lowered cholesterol and blood pressure), but my BMI went from 33 to 24.9, and my body (fat) composition went from 42.9% to 33.6%. The certificate included these two photos, one taken at the beginning and the other taken just last week. Everyone marveled over the changes, and some folks were almost unrecognizable. In fact, one woman shared that when she pulled up and got out at a family member’s home for Thanksgiving (who hadn’t seen her during the program), they asked “Are you lost?” and came over to the car to give the “stranger” directions!
Spending the last few weeks battling with an exciting respiratory tract infection has given me an unusual amount of time to become closely acquainted with both my sofa and various television offerings. You will be no doubt startled to hear that my preference is for crime drama programming and luckily for me, now is a wonderful time to be a TV crime fan.
1 blend
Back in the early 70's the Chilhowee Mountain stretch was the part of the Parkway that was most accessable to me. It was about 15 minutes from my parents house to the parkway entrance so it was a easy place to go for a pleasant drive, to watch the sunset, or park and enjoy the city lights at night. The views were spectacular--the Great Smoky Mountains to the south and the beautiful Tennessee Valley to the north. If it was really clear, looking northward you could possibly see past Maryville-Alcoa to Knoxville and as far the Cumberland Mountains. No matter what the time of day the views were picture postcard perfect.
However this does present some interesting quandaries about the way we present Jesus. Traditionally we preach that if you come to Him you can be forgiven, but how do people who don’t recognise a need to be forgiven relate to this? Is now the time to focus on other aspects of God that may appeal more? Is there a correct order for coming to Christ? Is it ok for people to realise they need forgiveness after accepting Christ?
Share you meal - Meals in restaurants are usually big enough to share. If you know how to look at a menu and what to order you can usually find a large meal to share anywhere! :)
Pea - Champion of England - This will be our first year growing peas.
.....but I can see it and remember it like it was yesterday.....
Penciller: Brett Booth
“During natural disasters like earthquakes or hurricanes phone lines may go down so SMS and Twitter may be the only ways to communicate,” she said. “It’s important to have these types of accounts set up, and know how to use them, before an extreme weather event occurs.”
I’ve already voted. And I’ve already had a re-think on my top 5. That’s just how subjective beer really is, I guess.
Please look over the schedule carefully so you can pace yourself more accurately.
Please not the emphasis on prejudice. When you spend your careers actively campaigning against the LGBTQ community, raising and spending millions of dollars to prevent (or repeal) equality, all the while playing the “love the sinner hate the sin” card, you are practicing prejudice. That makes you homophobic.
“We need an approach that goes after waste in the budget and gets rid of pet projects that cost billions of dollars,” Obama said. “We need an approach that makes some serious cuts to worthy programs – cuts I wouldn’t make under normal circumstances. And we need an approach that asks everybody to do their part.”
"SILENCE!"
I am once again amazed that our God, my God would do all this for me, for us. His justice and mercy would meet on the cross, the only place where my sin could be dealt with. It was the place where death could be defeated, life could be restored and I could be welcomed home.
I think it's great, and pretty entertaining really, that this example of Libertarian ideology -- which Rand Paul and his father Ron Paul both hold so dear -- has been exposed as illogical so early in his candidacy. Rand Paul's bumbling attempts to address his self-contradictory stance, all while completely failing to address it, just might bring about the kind of sunlight that could disinfect a lot of the rising and similarly bankrupt Tea-Party ideology (its adherents fervently support Rand's candidacy).
Or maybe there was and I just cannot remember it.
So these are all the tricks I used to create a perfect cheesecake. Not sure if any or all of them are the reason it didn’t crack, but I’m definitely trying all of them again next time to see if it really is fail proof or just a fluke!
"Yes," wrote the 24 year old William Butler Yeats in 1889, "my beard is off!"
Is tobacco a sin? Probably, if you put it before your kids health, it may be. If you place it before your own health, and lose a leg like my Father In-Law, it may be. Is hoarding, if it causes your kids to be unhealthy or unsafe? Sure. Not being considerate of others can be evil. If you will not give it up for anything or anyone, that you covet it more then God Himself, then sure, it is a sin.
He, too, saw that the attack on The Satanic Verses was not an isolated occurrence; that, across the Muslim world, writers and journalists and artists were being accused of the same crimes – blasphemy, heresy, apostasy, and their modern-day associates, “insult” and “offence.” And he intuited that beyond this intellectual assault lay the possibility of an attack on a broader front. He quoted Heine to me. Where they burn books they will afterwards burn people. (And reminded me, with his profound sense of irony, that Heine’s line, in his play Almansor, had referred to the burning of the Qur’an.) And on September 11, 2001, he, and all of us, understood that what began with a book-burning in Bradford, Yorkshire, had now burst upon the whole world’s consciousness in the form of those tragically burning buildings. . .
Here at Field & Country Racing we offer horses for full or part ownership, or to lease. Either way we train horses at some of the best facilities in the UK at Bolton Hall Stables.
Captain Gavin Briggs is charged with finding and bringing Christina to her grandfather. He did not expect to find her so appealing but he had a job to do. Somehow he was going to get her to the Duke but Gavin will find there will be plenty bumps in the road especially if Christina wants to have him help her find the blackmailer.
Crafters Workshop and All Night media stencils
So much of the book and the play based upon it IS ambiguous, however, and this accounts for the book’s falling out of favor and the ultimate equation of the name Uncle Tom with a compliant, docile and subservient black. Even as Uncle Tom’s Cabin itself went out of fashion itself in the age of talkies, echoes (such as Bill Robinson’s roles in several Shirley Temple pictures) had become more than distasteful by the late twentieth century. The ultimate truth is, while the book is strongly anti-slavery, and extremely sympathetic to the plight of African Americans, it can’t help but be unconsciously mired in the attitudes of its own day, attitudes we have long since outgrown. The extremely difficult question for the modern producer is, how to present this important cultural object, while not only not seeming to embrace its unfortunate prejudices, but perhaps even using them as an opportunity to teach and begin a conversation?
Given this confluence of supportive demand drivers and benign supply conditions, we believe the recent strength in the Singapore industrial property sector should be sustainable for the remainder of this year. In fact, we see a good chance that this often-neglected asset class could turn out to be the proverbial “dark horse” of the property sector this year, edging out the perennial favourites.
In our impatient, sound byte society, where the news reporters tend to pluck phrases and nuggets as news and we viewers take what the say as gospel, we many times miss the real story. That is one of the reasons I watch PBS News Hour, as they take the time to do more in-depth reporting by people who know their subject matter. One of my constant themes is explained by this title – context is everything. Anyone can be made to look foolish by taking their words out of context. Plus, in so doing, the real story is often missed.
(Roaring Brook Press, an imprint of Macmillan Children’s Publishing Group)
23. Did you ever do the speed skate races?? I did, but I never won. I always had a better chance at the dice game. Now, don't get me wrong....I could do some "mean" shuffle skating and skate backwards like there was not tomorrow. Man I'm cracking myself up. Really, I could!!!!
This week, I had a sizzler on my TBR list that was a switch-up from what I normally read. While the Boys are Away, by return author Lucy Felthouse, crossed my fingertips and was the romance novel one very INTERESTING read! I love Lucy‘s work and this one promises to be a scintillating series of three tales off the normal beaten bath of what I read! So, while I blush my way through the pages, let me grant you a little insite into this delicious little read:
Q029) Out of 2NE1’s activities, which is the one that left the biggest impression?
a sort of nicer, more palatable version of Siouxsie Sioux,
Reduce the heat to 160 degrees C and put the baking tray to the lower level of your oven. Bake for another 20 to 30 minutes, covering the cake with greaseproof paper if the surface gets too dark. Prick the middle of the cake with a fork to make sure it's done, take it out of the oven and leave to cool. Dust with icing sugar.
I also purchased the Sheer Finish Pressed Powder in soft sand when I visited Buffalo. Darn you Canada, why are things so expensive... I got the powder for $34USD and it sells for $45CAD here.
But it was Shakir's broken marriage, her life as a single mother, her charisma, and most of all her early death that Marvi was drawn to.That same "yearning, vulnerable intimacy beyond technique" can be heard at some points in Hussein's own narrative, as when Mehran comes to see that his essential condition is solitude, and that, unlike the cloud messenger of Kalidasa's Meghduta who carries a message from the lover to his beloved, in his own case he must "be a messenger to himself, carrying stories from the places of his past to his present place, and back again from present to past."
All you have to do to be in with a chance of winning this candy is become a follower of this blog and make on comment on this post. If you do have a blog then please help us share the candy by posting a piccie on your sidebar but you don't have to (so it's fine to enter if you don't have a blog!)
By now most people have read the books, I have read the books multiple times because they are so amazing to read. The detail, the characters and plot are out of this world. I really could continue to read Harry Potter for years and years to come. The second story in the world of Harry Potter is Harry Potter and The Chamber of Secrets.
I've had several recipes in the top 5 or 10 over the years, but the fun of contests for me is simply the challenge of creating a new, original recipe, using specific ingredients. Often there are ingredients I wouldn't normally pair up that turn out surprisingly good. I was delighted to see my omelet in the number one spot this round, but especially surprised when it stayed there and took home the first place win! I'd like to share the slightly revised recipe. After all the reviews were in I took the main suggestion to saute the onion and zucchini before adding to the egg mixture. This is probably something I would have done anyway, had I considered what I was doing contest-worthy, and not just a way to use up the ingredients and quiet the natives. Feel free to substitute white onion for the purple, reduce the number of eggs, and even add some garlic, if desired. Enjoy!
What a way to break this baby in!
so she does both, and she tries out for this dance at school, but her and her friends do not get pick because they’re not “good enough”, so they end up being in a play by one of the teachers, because the teacher doesn’t have any students starring in it. also, it’s because no one really watches it, they all go watch the pretty girls do the dance thing.
"I should really like to think there's something wrong with me —
I found the martial chart here. Tried to find an email address for the blogger (Even slatterns should have manners), but I couldn't so if it's you, forgive me and thank you.
For those who have watched the blog waiting for news, thanks for your patience. Thanks for your prayers for Haiti, for following the news, following blogs, praying, collecting, fund raising, considering your own reality in light of the lives of others. I’ve needed space to retreat into self and into the sanctity of our family. Its been harder than I expected to find our footing, but slowly we begin to make sense of our here and now. We learn to let go of control, a plan. We give way to grief and find strength with the acceptance and hope that emerges when the tears run dry.
D: *Parmesan Breaded Chicken & Veggies
will face their doom
Beth: I didn’t really have a goal in mind for this race because I knew I needed to see how the weather would play out so my goal would be determined out on the course. Somewhere in mile 1 a man asked where the water stops were and I told him I had heard they were few and far between out here. In these miles I saw a man who is a regular with me in spin class and talks to me about my running. He asked me why I wasn’t further up and I told him I was trying! Ha. Teal and I had decided we needed to take advantage of each water stop since we wouldn’t know how the weather would be throughout the race. At the second water station we had to stop and wait for water to be poured in a cup for us.
1/2 cup chopped fresh basil plus leaves for garnish
Drop me a line at velcrovisionillustration@gmail.com if you’re interested in ordering one or many. They’ll also be up in my Etsy shop just as soon as I get a sample copy printed. (There will also be a French version available soon, so specify if you’d like it in French.) I created them in a 8.5 x 14″ legal page format, but I might bring it up to a standard calendar size 11 x 17″, depending on the quotes I get from my printer.
it seems so natural for m to be singing, talking, making up stories.
Julian Assange was taken into custody and appeared in front of the court on Tuesday. The 29-year old Australian has allegedly committed sex crimes while he was in Sweden, but up until date he hasn’t been officially charged for any crime.
Craig Keener has written several books but in this particular case I will depend upon his massive Bible Background Commentary: New Testament. Keener notes a couple of important aspects of the parables in the New Testament. First, he writes: “Rabbis commonly taught in parables, sermon illustrations, to communicate their main point or points. This Palestinian Jewish teaching form appears in the New Testament only in the teaching of Jesus, and thus cannot be attributed to composition by the later church outside Jewish Palestine.” (81-82)
Take a look what I saw out front this morning.
Where can I find zines?
Don’t you know.
Pyramid & Magic Hat Brewery, Sampling in the Beer Department
Black Dye Ink
Today I needed to get a LOT of testing done one on one with my class. Even though I have a red stop sign on the end of a ruler that I flash in front of my students if they attempt to approach me during testing it still never fails that I get interrupted during the sacred reading/testing time. My team leader has a skull and crossbones that she flashes if her students try to approach. L.O.V.E.I.T.
“If you think it’s alive, ” began Tammy.
The Captain couldn't place the accent. It was English, he speculated, that may have once known its way around Spanish or something like it. He looked around the souk to see if anyone else had noticed. Aside from the bored stare of the coffee vendor, slumped next to his pots, no one was paying attention. The Captain looked back down, into a pair of obsidian eyes peering out from a headwrap that made mummy's linen look positively fresh. A hot breeze swept across the plaza, stinging the nostrils with Saharan grit and the pungent aroma of spice. The Captain coughed. The lump stirred not a bit, its arm still outstretched.
It is unavoidable for all of us to go under different amount and kinds of pressures here in this world. But God's Word is here to tell us how to avoid them and even gain victory. It is a matter of trusting His Word, believing in what He can do for us and obeying what His Word says.
"Had my ancestor not made it out of here,' Richburg muses, 'I might have ended up in that crowd...maybe I would have been one of those bodies, washing over the waterfall in Tanzania or maybe my son would have been set ablaze by soldiers. Or I would be limping now from the torture I received in some rancid police cell...' – Sourced from www.revisionisthistory.org - (follow the link to read more)
The roughly two-hour service for the 69-year-old Clemons, known as the Big Man was Springsteen’s main foil onstage over their long careers.
Ideally you’ll want to eat as many foods as possible in their unprocessed state; typically organic, biodynamic foods that have been grown locally, and are therefore in season. But even when you choose the best foods available you can destroy most of the nutrition if you cook them. I believe it’s really wise to strive to get as much raw food in your diet as possible.
Ephesians 2:8-10
follows the very public and passionate fight waged by residents and business owners of Brooklyn’s historic Prospect Heights neighborhood facing condemnation of their property to make way for the polarizing Atlantic Yards project (the densest real estate development in U.S. history).
Section 217. Biennial Reports.--(a) The board's Bureau of Alcohol Education shall prepare a report on underage alcohol drinking and high risk college alcohol drinking in this Commonwealth.
23. Unschooling families hope that people who don't understand our lifestyle will learn about it as openly as unschooled kids learn everything else.
So, they always ended up back in my basement.
Help me, Heal Me, Fulfill Your Word
Head to the seventh annual Baby Shower benefiting the Sacramento Crisis Nurseries. SCN is a group that offers safe, temporary shelter children of families going through a crisis. They have a wish list of objects you can donate. They request objects be new and not gift wrapped. Lunch and refreshments will be provided, and reservations are preferred.
To strengthen it, I put extra pieces of foam board over the seams.
Be clear that in the ordering of global affairs by the current US government, South Africa will no longer play the role that it has done in the period since 1994, and especially since 1999. The irony is that this marks a significant departure from the policy positions adopted by the Bill Clinton and George Bush administrations. In practice, both those administrations treated South Africa as a major global and strategic actor, and interacted with successive governments in a manner consistent with this designation, major differences and policy fall-outs notwithstanding. It seems clear that in its understanding of “the world as it is”, the Obama administration has determined that South Africa has been “punching above its weight” and should no longer be allowed to do so.
That being said, its raining and cold in Johannesburg so maybe I will go for a run this afternoon after work – I have good intentions don’t I.
1. Live on Purpose (spiritual)
On the second day on Vancouver Island, Maidei peeked into the Sea Cidery place, where hard cider was pressed from different local apples which netted a range of mild alcoholic cider varieties for sale.
hurt you
This argument is most appealing since it binds together all those things we hold dearest and, what's more, suggests a sort of virtuous circle in which the revenues generated by increased employment and the prosperity which accompanies it will likely be reinvested in the development of new IP-based products and processes, thus stimulating even fuller employment.
Enter your contact information… and the website will open for you.
Might be shady or inexperienced business owners.
You are already starting out with this core belief that you have a huge job ahead of you that is believed to be essentially, futile. When you were very young you had first been told over and over, until you were convinced, that the person/adult that was feeding you this information was the authority. So this is the first brainwashing, if you will, that occurred. You believed everything that was coming out of the adults mouth. Well in believing that this adult has the truth or is the authority, you must believe whatever comes from them thereafter. What comes thereafter is the “you” statements that brainwashed you into believing who and what you were along with what was possible to accomplish. So first you became convinced that THEY were the authority, then you became convinced that what they told you about who you were was true, because after all, if they are without doubt the authority then what they say must be true. Along with telling you who you are they told you without doubt what was possible in this life. And one of these beliefs is that; beliefs are permanent or at best extremely difficult to change, you can't teach an old dog new tricks, or no one ever changes really.
Tripadvisor.com
Q: And if you were to pick something from that which left the deepest impression?
Catalina, dazzled by a world of riches and a life full of luxuries, decides not to continue her relationship with her boyfriend Albeiro, a young man from her town who has very few ambitions, but loves her with all his heart. She decides to search for someone who can pay for or finance her surgery of silicon breast implants since, according to her belief, this will provide her the fame and wealth she longs
*Best moment this week?: Hearing the OB say they will switch my blood thinners this week....I haven't talked about it much, but when I was 14 weeks pregnant I was diagnosed with blood clots in my leg (due to a lot of pain behind my knee, an ultrasound was done and I was diagnosed with pregnancy induced blood clots). Up to this week I have been on a blood thinner that, in the event I go into labor, is not compatible with surgery. They would need to put me to sleep if I go into labor..(a little more dangerous AND I wouldn't be awake to see my son). Later this week, they will switch those thinners to one that allows me to be awake for my C-section, and won't be as risky if I go into labor. SO, at the end of the week I am excited to switch the blood thinners...it takes away lots of the anxiety I'm feeling about delivery!!
The complex duality that tensions Adams’s individual pictures also resonates throughout his larger body of work, an aspect that can be uniquely experienced through the more than thirty photographic books he has published to date. It is from these volumes that the texts in this exhibition have primarily been drawn.
4. What is the UNC’s position on crime and how are they going to reduce crime in T&T? What do you intend to do different? Do you have any concrete plans/initiatives to ensure the population that you can indeed put measures in place to reduce crime?
Thanks be to God.
In order to deal with the trouble they're in, these stores have changed up their inventory. For example, they'll add a "Build a Bear" section or maybe sell CDs or DVDs. That limits the number of books they can stock. They also choose to stock books that are BIG bestsellers. So you'll see a whole wall of, let's say, Vampire Academy, but they won't stock some of the smaller titles, like Blood Coven, because they're not as much of a "sure thing."
How will you prepare your heart for your next church gathering? What can you do in advance to set a reverent and worshipful tone for your family as you prepare to go to church? If someone in your family is usually late and this is creating tension, will you ask God for creative and clear solutions? If that person is you, will you ask God to show you what fruit of the Spirit or attribute of His character you are lacking that is causing you to inconvenience others? Will you ask your pastor if there is any way you could help with preparations for church services? Before church will you look in the mirror and ask: Am I dressed in a manner that is appropriate for my church's culture, or will I possibly cause a distraction, offense, or temptation based on the outfit I have selected to wear to church? Will you change your outfit if necessary so that more focus can be spent on God rather than your outfit, hair style, accessories, or makeup? Are you participating in any distracting activities during church? Texting? Facebook? Surfing the web? Do you need to leave your phone in the car? Will you remember to turn off all notifications and if possible turn it off completely? How can you be more prepared to have a reverent heart during the sermon? Will you come to church prepared to take notes? If you know in advance what subject or passage the sermon will be on, how will you prepare throughout the week to receive that message?
Scattered around some of these homes, littering the lawns and driveways like nasty lawn ornaments, are numerous corpses. It is hard to tell if some of these corpses were zombies that were shot or if these corpses are the result of pitched battles. Probably a little of both I am guessing.
- wave using the "all done" sign
Both colors are striking red transparents. They change color when heated, cooled and reheated.
After 6 years of work in the media industry, Flavia decided she wanted to add a stronger theoretical business foundation to her experience. ‘I am looking to gain a critical perspective on business and industry structures, to be equipped with the strategies and tools
14. Would a 1/3 crossover work?
NYC in general: Crowded. Impersonal. Cranky shop owners. Much like Chicago by day, except bigger, busier, and dirty. Much like Vegas at night (Love the lights!). Over-priced. Noisy.
That's Australian law, apparently
On learning that one has been short-listed for anything, a writer’s invariable first thought is, What shall I wear? This is because they are not normally dressy people. Pyjamas, baggy track tops, elderly jeans – these make up the usual uniform of work-from-home writers. The two poets hadn’t a thing in their wardrobes appropriate for such an occasion.
I first discovered Brenda Wootton through the ýlowek scavel-cronek blog, which has, between African lps and Jackie Chan soundtracks posted 4 of her releases so far. If you like this record, I recommend you take a look at his postings (and even if you don't you should check out his great blog).
Gardeners World, Britain
Howard Marshall wrote, “The lesson here is a deeper one; instead of simply healing the man’s body in response to his faith, Jesus pronounces the forgiveness of his sins, thereby demonstrating that the full salvation of men, both spiritual and physical, depends upon faith in the ability of Jesus to act with the authority and the grace of God.” (213)
any extra leftover bones you have kicking around, optional
We have decided that due to other commitments that our Wednesday run is over. We do hope that when our time frees up that we will return. Thanks to all who participated.
(Mark Deming)
Restrictions, restrictions. Note the currency that will be hidden from view will be the euro. Can’t let the Europeans see how the yen/dollar black hole operates. They must be kept guessing.
sure to be your new favorite images!
And as a special treat, I give you the grand finale, the piece de le resistance! This was found floating about the dining room once all guests had taken their leave. Hear the beautiful cadence and potential in these lines . . . and watch it all fall apart.
I told some girlfriends on a message board I’m on that the pain is hard to describe. It was like someone pinched me really hard in a spot that I’d never expect or want to get pinched. EVER. It fucking sucked.
Got to get back to work now.
It feels like I'm moving
Well, I tried out the new line yesterday. It didn't go so well.
So in my excitement, I quickly dispatched myself from the theatre to use the ladies; super fast before the movie began and stuff, right? Don't wanna miss any slaughtery and distopiaAAAaaa! So I zipped into the ladies room with purpose, only to discover a man peeing in a sink. In the ladies. I froze.
Despite Santos’s lukewarm endorsement of drug legalization, he adds his voice to the growing number of Latin American leaders calling for ending prohibition.
As i discovered how it feels to have your heart breaking.
In the same manner, using Chyavanprash is a good method of rebuilding energy. As a nutritive jam, it may substitute the need for a stimulant like caffeine as well as sugar to provide you with that additional energy boost. It is mentioned to help rejuvenate the body through improving the body’s resistance and metabolism, helping digestion of food, and promoting healthy energy levels.
but these pictures should give you the general idea...
Receiving its first guests exactly 100 years ago on this very day (the “official” opening was a few weeks later with a three-day gala from May 12-14), the Beverly Hills, or more affectionately, the Pink Palace, has withstood the test of time growing from its naked awkwardness in that bean field into one of the world’s most legendary hostelries with a guest register that has always bulged, and always will bulge, with names at the very top of whatever field with which they are associated. There is something special about the Beverly Hills Hotel that sets it apart, a certain magic lingering about the place that is almost palpable. While I concede that little piece of prose sounds about as purple as a hack like me can churn out, in this case it’s actually true! Think of the famous Southland resort hotels of 1912 that made up the impressive competition the Beverly Hills faced when it opened. How many are left today?
So as I approach my third labour, I've reflected long and hard on what having a homebirth means to me. I've wrestled with my conscience over homebirthing, not wanting to put my birth support through an emergency experience should I have another haemorrhage. But what it comes down to is this:
While I enjoyed the mudbugs…I must say that I feel like I got tricked a little. I had to purchase my ticket in advance, but I don’t know what that ticket was for. The band left early, I still had to pay for food/drinks, and I still had to pay for food/drink…need I say more?
Alfred Hitchcock is known primarily for his thrillers and suspense films, but this is a very different kind of Hitchcock film--which stands out as one of his very best, both for its distinction from much of the rest of the director's body of work, and also by virtue of being a damn fine motion picture.
But Nordrhein-Westfalen actually felt sorry for us, or maybe wanted to encourage people to apply there, so they gave us all a free trip to Berlin in the March of the school year. It almost made Solingen worthwhile.
I'm practicing trusting them now, when the issues are things like whether to brush hair or wear the same clothes for three days in a row or when to go to sleep. These small details will not matter in the grand scheme of our relationship, except that my children will know what freedom and self-control feel like, because they are actually allowed to control themselves. I'm hoping all of this practice will prepare me for when the issues get much bigger. When my kids are deciding who to date or marry, and how to raise their own children, I'm hoping I can continue to support them without criticizing them or pushing my own preferences on them.
2 easier
Himachal Pradesh is one of the beautiful states of Northern India. Thousands of people from all around the world plan for Himachal Tour every year. People sometimes call this place ‘Lands of Gods’ as it is a great center of numerous religious places. It is a favorite place for different kinds of tourists like nature lovers, adventure seekers and pilgrims from all over the world. It is a favorite destination for honeymoon couples also as it has lots of hill stations like Manali, Shimla, Dharamshala and many others. If you are a nature lover, adventure seeker or any pilgrim then you should explore Himachal Pradesh in a nice way by taking the help of Himachal tour packages.
Somehow the turkey got done a full hour than we expected. I hadn't even baked the stuffing yet! It all worked out in the end though. The turkey was cold, but all the side dishes, including the gravy, was hot. Truth be told, ya can't tell if your turkey is hot or cold when it is smothered in molten gravy. We will be eating turkey left overs for some time. This bird is so massive that I cut up the carcass into thirds. I made turkey stock with the first portion and froze the others to make stock later.
I used a backing paper from the Christmas Cheer CD, over stamped with a flourish and embossed in gold and mat and layered onto some brown card stock misted with bronze and orange mica sprays and a cute little teddy bear santa.
Who can resist belting out “Go West!”? The Pet Shop Boys are pure, undiluted joy that has been digitised and pushed through your ears. I don’t care what people think of me any longer. I’m coming out of the closet. It feels liberating to say this out loud.
So I say to the missus
I understand rap. I'm not a big fan, but at least it's rebelleous, it pisses off parents, and has some passion to it. But what the hell is up with bands on serious downers. Coldplay is like the U2 without the passion and war on poverty.
Chico, CA (03/06/2009) --Sierra Nevada Brewing Co. is pleased to announce the release of Kellerweis Hefeweizen into their year-round portfolio of beers. This is the second new year-round release from the brewery in 2009, and a great addition to their lineup of world-class beers.
The girls especially like portrait photography and are tip toeing into wedding photography.
Should you go offroading in this cutthroat environment where the renault clio engine be up for by being one of the renault clio engine management that defined the renault clio engine management in style or sophistication but it's more compact and helps the renault clio engine management and it isn't the renault clio engine management or plushest either. What it does and has found space in there too and they appreciated the renault clio engine management on the renault clio engine an hour or so, it was asked more promptly.
This is something I think about often. In my previous jobs I had fun at work when I accomplished things that were difficult. I had fun when I rallied my crew together to make things happen, or when we were all just a little punchy on a Friday afternoon as we prepared for the week ahead. I had fun when I got to bring my dog in and she helped out by greeting everyone who came into my office with a tail wag. But this is not the norm. People just don't have fun at work.
Being my first entry, I feel the obligation to introduce myself. I wouldn’t want a reader to feel like a stranger (and I’m assuming I already have readers. A big thank you to everyone who hasn’t chosen to leave this page and decided to give me a chance after reading the first sentence).
1) My right pinky finger is crooked. I grew up playing piano and it never interfered with my ability to do so. It is subtle and you would only notice now because I brought attention to it!
I’m just a regular Joe Drunk… I do nothing. I don’ have to work,
Finally jonathan was able to bring her around to me so i could see her better.
It was a great night that ended with some of us (this time I really won’t name names) retiring to the local pub for a few too many bottles of wines. We then said our farewells, and I chose to walk home in an effort to sober up. It didn’t work because I had to phone my husband to let me in the front door – pesky key just wouldn’t get into that lock.
I see travelers as our European Nomads; they have their life-style, religion, habits and rules.
Does this bother you? It should! It REALLY bothers me! This was at the Krispy Kreme Doughnut store in Winston-Salem. I just never cease to be amazed. This young man… No, I shouldn’t call him a “young man.” No…this “kidult,” said to his father, “Hey Dad, did you get me somethin’ to drink too? You know I’ve got to have something to drink with this!” Wow! But, I shouldn’t be surprised. This is the condition of our country.
Legitimate concerns about this question may haunt the Obama campaign until its crushing defeat next November.
Now that the holidays are behind us, we're back focused on healthy food. Last night I pulled a couple of chicken breasts out of the freezer, my copy of Eating Well Serves Two off of the book shelf, and the rest of the ingredients for the Tarragon Chicken on page 122 out of the refrigerator and the pantry. Twenty minutes later, dinner was on the table.
Smartgardener.com can help you find out how to improve your soil and will also help you to find and buy plants that are perfect for your climate. They even offer you an option to buy seeds that you can use where you live and design your garden to make the most out of your available space.
So now that I've given the film all this free advertising, why is it even interesting?
The same old bailouts for friends and Corporations, the same old policies that will begin a new war, the same old practices that force more U.S. Businesses to bankrupt then close and be liquidated. More Citizens out of work, more inflation due to the ever failing economy and monetary system, more dishonest sleazy politicians making millions while in office. Wavy dark hair and perfect teeth in smiles as practiced as the sunset: they remind me of a small school of large sharks circling each other...just waiting to take the first bite!
Tomorrow the weather will be better, That's a promise.
It found significant improvements in the nutritional value of meals offered by secondary schools and healthier choices made by pupils.
My voice imitation of senior Oh Kwang Rok on MBC Music’s ‘Show Champion’ was not something that I had practiced. I always joked around by copying him and it just naturally became my personal talent. The member that actually has a lot of hidden talents is Baekhyun.
Indiana University School of Social Work
Of whom is Peter writing? He is writing of Jesus Christ. The church will be built on Jesus Christ. It would be blasphemy to think anyone else could take that place which naturally and scripturally belongs to God in the person of Jesus Christ.
My problem is that my eyelashes are upside down. (The clever people among you would have realised that from the title. Humour me.)
Breakfast? Seriously? The only breakfast I've eaten the last.. six weeks, was when mom was here over christmas. Otherwise, I wake up around lunchtime and then I have lunch. Not breakfast. No wait! I actually have a picture of the christmas breakfast! Wait.. Fine ass quality moose/elk/whateveryoucallit sausage. Luxury!
Romans 3:24
You don’t know me,
I came home and googled variations that combined “Jamaat ul-Fuqra” and “Meherrin.” There are few references to be found on the internet concerning the commune near Meherrin, and all of them seem to derive from the same series of Washington Times stories in 2002, prior to the Beltway sniper incidents. From a cached version of a Washington Times article on July 1, 2002: Militant American Muslims operating out of rural communes in California and other Western states have targeted this rural Virginia community for an influx of members who have ties to Middle Eastern terrorists.Law-enforcement authorities said the Muslims — mostly converts — are expected to join with radical Muslims living on 45 acres in this small Charlotte County community, 25 acres near Meherrin in neighboring Prince Edward County and on other parcels of land owned by the group's members and supporters.There is also a Word document from MIPT (the National Memorial Institute for the Prevention of Terrorism, associated with the Department of Homeland Security) which contains this: In Virginia, Muslims of the Americas has established communes on 45 acres of land east of Red House in Charlotte County and on 25 acres near Meherrin in neighboring Prince Edward County. Additionally, a number of black Muslims have purchased smaller lots in the region and attend prayer services at the Red House commune. Law-enforcement authorities said the organization has been negotiating to purchase an additional 100 acres in Campbell County. Anywhere from 200 to 300 people, including women and children, are believed to live on the two sites, although the number varies and is hard to confirm, authorities said.Remember that Sheikh Gilani, the founder of Jamaat ul-Fuqra, is the man that Daniel Pearl was attempting to interview when he was abducted and beheaded. The State Department reported his death on February 21st, 2002. The above-mentioned MIPT report was based on a Washington Times article dated February 18th, 2002, just three days before the announcement.
Think about this technique at home and during extra-curricular activities as well. Did your significant other or child do something you don’t like? Let him/her know, but use the positive, negative, positive technique and I can guarantee your chances of an all-out brawl will greatly decrease.
Decreased productivity can reduce wages, as employers penalize less productive workers. Obesity hits workers’ pocketbooks indirectly, too: Numerous studies have shown that the obese are less likely to be hired and promoted than their svelte peers are. Women in particular bear the brunt of that, earning about 11 percent less than women of healthy weight, health economist John Cawley of Cornell University found. At the average weekly U.S. wage of $669 in 2010, that’s a $76 weekly obesity tax.
The singer was excited about the design. “Ahhh it’s so purrty.. So excited, nervous and hyper,” she tweeted to fans on April 11, showing off her perfume bottles and packaging.
Personal blogging is like the new reality TV.
Read this book and see what a daily embracing of the Gospel looks like. See how spiritual disciplines will move you deeper and closer in your relationship to the Gospel and to Christ Himself. See how we are responsible to live out the commands of Jesus, while at the same time depending “on the Holy Spirit to both do His own work and enable us through His power to do the work we must do.”
For those of you who absolutely love to read, here is the bill in full:
When my child screams at me when she is hungry or exhausted, it's just like when she is too tired to walk. In either case, I offer food and a chance to rest. I don't expect her to be able to communicate perfectly politely all the time, just like I don't expect her to walk all the time.
Since moving, Boo has two of the single units and our closet along his side of the room, and I have the large unit with one smaller wardrobe attached along mine.
Carlo Lorenzini
Pours a nice brown, tinged with red. Tan head dissipates to a collar pretty quickly. Nice slightly nutty smell, with minimal hops.
Level 13: MP Cost: 30, Damage: 242%, Attacks up to 6 enemies 3 times, 13% chance to stun the enemy for 3 seconds.
I had fun, though. With my cousin and girlfriends. I had been so excited earlier that day but after arriving at the place where the event was held, I was like, “Damn, I feel like I am the most pious girl in here!” Nah, I am not criticizing anyone. It was cool to see how everyone be themselves. If you’re a smoker, just smoke at the area specially provided for smokers.
It's hard to have adventures, the daily kind and the more adventurous kind, and not write about them here (yet).
Curry is calming, but not boring. It's familiar, yet still slightly exotic. It adds such a different dimension to even the most ordinary food (a.k.a. chicken), and it almost makes you feel as if you did, perhaps, Wang Chung tonight. It's always always always the thing I want to taste when I really need to unplug from work and take the night off to enjoy the comforts of home. So, I was super-psyched to be able to make this dish during a week that I've been swamped and deluged with work.
This may be a niche book but it is one which was needed and I am also glad to see another book which further love and understanding for Sake. Kanpai to William!
Licenced patents. : This generally includes the patents, patent applications, continuation, continuations-in-part, and divisions that relate to the licenced technology. If the licence includes foreign countries, the definition would then include the foreign counterparts of the patents and applications in each country. If there are several patents, patents applications etc., they are usually listed in an attached schedule, which shows the necessary specific details of each. Typical scheduled headings are licensor identification or docket number, patent title, country(ies) where the patent is issued or filed, filing date, patent number for those that have been issued and the issue date.
in the fading lilacs, alyssum in bloom,
Be Helped
i didn't even realize that she didn't have them until they were just there
(I apologise for the ads; if I can find a commercial-free version I’ll post it.)
I’m trying to see you
A vast majority of RA patients suffer from FATIGUE on a daily basis. This is not a minor issue or the same as what healthy individuals occasionally face with temporary illness, but a complication of the RA disease itself, usually associated with Chronic Pain.
Ah yes, after lots and lots of lorazepam on the Monday afternoon/evening/night the duty medical doctor decided to delete it from my drug chart as the drug of choice for calming me down when needed. Instead he added hydroxyzine which is a sedating antihistamine. The next time the nurse offered me some PRN meds, I think I was opening the window and trying to squeeze out through it, this was the drug I got. I was offered what dose I would like but was told that I could only have a maximum of 75mg in a day and the tablets were 25mg, so I opted for 25mg and settled down to think I would be vaguely relaxed and a little chilled out. Instead of which I slept most of the day. I remember my mum coming to visit me but apparently she left because I looked so dozy, I don’t recall her leaving, but the rest of the day is a blur.
“Pardon”
Unfortunately, we now live in an area where there's a lot of traffic and the playground is a few miles away. I often take my son to the playground in this town, but I still see kids who just show up and then leave before the lights come on.
Since we have three people going three different directions and I have super-duper-traffic-driving-anxiety coupled with a strong aversion to paying $300 a semester for a parking pass, I've been reduced to public transit. I am starting to consider this a sixteen week sociological study in giving up my personal space. The bus is very . . . ahem . . . intimate. That's all I have to say about that.
And grant us your salvation.
hopping from leaf to leaf,
Whether it’s Catholic, Christianity, Buddhism, Hinduism, Muslim.
First I'd like to thank you all for your insightful comments on my Blogging post. I just wanted to make myself clear that I was not asking for more comments, just stating that I think it a bit odd when people don't comment back on your blog after you have repeatedly commented on theirs. I think a simple, "Hello, or thanks for you comments," shouldn't take up too much time. I don't think you have to comment on every post your friends write, no one has that much time, and I really appreciate all of you and the time you take to visit me on this little blog. I loved reading your comments, bloggers are an amazing group, kind and so full of wisdom.
2. Bike
then all the beautiful things we borrowed from the florist and event planner.
A year ago I spoke of how Pieter wanted to move into the city and put the kids in schools etc. He journeyed with a shaman into the land of ayahuasca and he saw the light. He is wanting to bring the plants into his repertoire. The dream keeps changing.
Just head to the taxi stand, no need to book in advance. Cost about NZ$50 – NZ$65.
TEXQI Blog (texqiblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
In the cook shops and bakeries and at the evening balls too, ladies were tempted by jellies and syllabubs. Jellies were boiled from the four bones of calves feet, spiced with nutmeg, mace and clove and coloured (sometimes in layers as 'ribbon jelly') with cochineal, spinach, saffron or syrup of violets. The instructions, to 'take out the bones of four calves feet' would daunt most present-day cooks, I imagine.
In a scene between the Security Chief and the Chief Scientist, the former explains his theory that the War Chief brought the Doctor and his friends here and how his people have the secret of time travel, The Time Lords!!! That's the first time we've head that. Time Lords. It's amazing how many things that will go on to become synonymous with Doctor Who that started right here in The War Games. The Doctor tricks the Chief Scientist and de-processes Carstairs, together they rescue Jamie, who unsurprisingly was not killed and Zoe and Russell escape back to the American Civil War Zone.
She's a little bit Aqua and a little bit Forest Floor.
I'm gonna go out on a psychological limb here for a minute and pose a rhetorical statement to you: I say that the most breathtaking, most exciting and outlandish action film of 1987 was based - in part, at least - on the works of Mary Shelley. ...or at least one work of Mary Shelley.
the in-and-outer metaphors
1/2 stick (2 ozs.) unsalted butter
In any event, you can take all of this with a grain of salt if you like. I'm not sure how objective I'm being here, but I mostly liked Small Pond. I hope it gets picked up for distribution so it can be seen beyond the festival circuit and I hope it means that Josh Slates gets to make another movie.
My over active imagination also went to work leaving me giggling like a fool all the way round the shop thinking about the elderly charity shop helpers getting in on the action.
realized, it would destroy any advantages the President enjoys in today's polls. We would like to expand in our reasoning and analysis of the likelihood of some, if not all, of these events that are coming to be in the last six months of this year, and most likely before the election. We will take them one at the time.
“Everything comes to him who hustles while he waits.” Thomas Alva Edison
Great Southern Bank, Springfield, MO
Per il piccolo banner nell'angolo ho usato una die Papertrey Ink e ho scritto a mano il sentiment.
Here is my reasoning:
This is possibly the most moving chapter where his wife gets the baby ready after her death. As she does so the father sips some of the milk she had expressed and struggles to describe the taste, finally settling on almonds. The child now dead, is then taken away:
I looked at her with annoyance.
Each generation starts again,
He’d shake his head in pity. “Ask me in about fifteen years.”
One major difference I felt, but would have a hard time pinpointing specific differences, is that Pathfinder tilts more in the direction of simulation, while Fourth Edition comes down on the more “gamist” side of the equation. Armor felt more realistic, with fighters having the highest, and wizards the lowest. Having a swim skill, and using it, was somehow nice. The thief being the only character with thievery was a good change of pace.
This result suggests that Denisovans ranged into Southeast Asia and interbred with the ancestors of some of today’s populations at least 44,000 years ago, a date suggested by archaeological finds, Reich said. When researchers used their findings to estimate mixing between ancestors of the present-day populations at that time, they found no sign that ancestors of today’s mainland East Asian populations were present. So those ancestors must have shown up in a later migration, the researchers concluded.
I guess this is what happens when you have an older brother because the crayons are in within reach of Brody and he gets them down to do crafts and then Trevor gets a hold of them. Or maybe it was because there were a few in one of Brody's backpacks in his room and Trevor got them. Oh well, I guess I'll try to watch more closely next time.
What was difficult? Dating? I didn’t want to date. Before I left Manchester I was in a relationship, so no dating there. When I left, I was more than happy to be on my own with my girls. I certainly didn’t begrudge them from preventing me from going out on the pull.
Two delightful children, Conrad and his younger sister Sanna, visit their grandparents on Christmas Eve, and on the journey back to their parents, darkness falls on their mountain pass. They become lost and walk the crags and crooked rocks. They are obviously in danger, but Stifter does not call attention to this menace, instead letting description of the landscape simply absorb the children. The tenderness with which the children are treated in the story -- by their grandparents (presents and kisses), by the loving description of the care Conrad and Sanna show for each, and by Stifter’s crisp and exact prose – make their vulnerability and presence on the mountain terrible. The result is not suspense exactly, but instead, you sense that something sweeping and monumental is at stake in the lives of these children. Throughout the trouble, the surface of the mountain echoes with the occasional tone of the village church bell, relaying the promise of the savior on Christmas as hope but also and more importantly, I would argue, demonstrating the odds against the little ones. It is an invocation to care for their safety. The bell is but a din on this thick snow, but its harmony is as loving as Conrad’s embrace of Sanna in a cave for their mutual warmth.
Will definately be posting very soon
9) Visual Organization
Weight: 2.14 pounds
Louise is in need of 50 more pairs of shorts by the end of June so if you would like to join in and make her a few then please follow this link to see how....they are simply made but I'm sure they will do the job nicely.
Natalie Wood is not only gorgeous here, but also does a good job in what is essentially the token "woman" role. And despite her presence in this, what could conceivably be considered one of those "event" films that came out about four or five a year in the Seventies, her performance is nothing when compared to This Property Is Condemned, West Side Story, Rebel Without A Cause or Splendor In The Grass. Unfortunately, she only had three more major roles ahead of her before being cruelly taken from us but, even in films like Meteor, she radiates a sharp, sensual presence even in what amounts to static dialogue scenes.
The teachers at the local school all have Post Traumatic Stress Disorder.
11 Getting In Tune
It was another lovely day here on the right coast. Nothing like the left coast has been having. None the less, the wee one and I took a jaunt.
34. Extra Track (03:04)
Core Java developer
I found this portrait of me that Mister Man made two years ago when he was in kindergarten. It was for Mother's Day, and I remember how proud he was to present it to me at the tea held at his school. We had a lovely afternoon, and all the kindergartners were so sweet.
Either they were kicked out by eminent domain or are inundated by bars, he said, adding, "It was a lose-lose for everybody in the area." (Well, certainly not for some retailers.)
Beat butter in bowl of an electric mixer on medium speed until fluffy, about 1 minute. Reduce mixer speed to low. Add confectioners' sugar, 1 cup at a time, beating for a few seconds between each addition. Increase mixer speed to medium and beat for about 3 minutes. Add the coffee mixture and milk; beat on low speed to combine. Scrape down sides and bottom of the bowl. Increase mixer speed to medium and beat until fluffy, about 4 minutes. Frosts 18 cupcakes.
Babel, the biblical ancient city where its’ inhabitants, after the Great Flood, were one people speaking one language. Then God, in His almighty wisdom, decided to have them speak many different languages.
This month at St Luke's there is only one rule and that is to have no layers on your card - stamp, draw, ink, emboss - whatever technique you fancy - just do it directly onto the base card.
See? We are not perfect nor profess to be.
Life happens though, so if people aren't able to complete the stitch swapping circle, I had an idea. Perhaps there are a few of you who would consider stitching something extra and mailing to someone who never ended up receiving a hoop. You wouldn't be getting another hoop, it would just be a gift mailed to a stranger.
People are starting to talk more to me about the churches, becoming a little more open - not forcing me to read between the lines quite so much. That helps - as does meeting people for the second or third time and actually being able to recognise them!
Stronger: Well, I joined an online personal trainer this past week. I absolutely LOVE this site! It gives you circuit work outs on Monday, Tuesday and Friday. It gives you personal training video sessions on Wednesdays. And you get a group fitness class video on Saturdays. It also has great video sessions on food and living. The community board is pretty great too. Lots of support from people who are 'doing it with you'.
This is the best book by Chetan Bhagat in my opinion. The events are plausible; though a little curious that so much happens during one night!! The train journey though is a little forced and could have been avoided.
2 cups confectioners' sugar
I liked Mockingjay. I’m contented with how the story ended. I liked how Peeta is alive in the end, contrary to how most fans hated that, and that they wanted Peeta to die. Katniss already lost Prim, you want her to lose Peeta as well? And from the start it was so obvious that she was never gonna end up with Gale, and that he was gonna leave her. They are two alike. They’re both .. fire.. in a sense. And fire is good, it keeps you warm. But too much fire will burn you. I think I took that from somewhere but I don’t remember where exactly, so credits to them. And considering that Gale might have been involved in Prim’s death, even though accidental, I don’t think their relationship will never be the same.
Anyhow, more to follow...we're just getting started on this wonderful vacation. Blessings to all of you, and remember...
The rave reviews and acrimony that comes with Dunedin’s Forsyth Barr Stadium could soon be capped by a new accolade – the title of world’s best venue. The roofed stadium has been named as one of five finalists vying for the “venue of the year” award at this year’s stadium industry awards, TheStadiumBusiness Awards 2012, to be announced in Italy next month.
Constantine: He is the Rock, his works are perfect, and all his ways are just. A faithful God who does no wrong, upright and just is he. Deuteronomy 32:4
On October 22,2011 we had Kyle's Court of Honor for his Eagle. We couldn't be prouder!!! We wanted to have it at the bowery since this was his Eagle Project. Kyle and Parker Lewis, of the 8th Ward, each were in charge of putting together nine tables for the bowery of our brand new Stake Center. It was a beautiful day, the weather was perfect.
So next time you have a great idea, jot it down, then put it aside and forget about it. Your current project will be better for it.
I went ahead & purchased a sassy prom dress with the intentions of finding a date. My dress was a spaghetti strap, mermaid cut, lime green number with a mesh cut out at the midriff. Whatever. I weighed 40 pounds less then. It was hot.
Goering agreed to surrender unconditionally but asked that his family be cared for, and the Nazi leader was delivered to Foster for transport the next day.
This shrimp would be tasty on a salad as well, but if you want to recreate our dish we used Rice Stick Noodles (found in the asian foods section of the grocery) and Bok Choy. Little secret I have never cooked Bok Choy before but now I love it.
9. Make sure children between 18 months and school age mix more than once a week with other children. This does not mean children should be separated from their mothers - old fashioned coffee-groups are perfect, especially if there are one or two unpleasant children involved.
A little more than halfway through a recent flight some serious boredom set in. I wasn't interested in paying for inflight wi-fi more than half way through so I thought, what can I make a unit on, that I already have clip art for?
On another note, our house is great. I’m sure I’ll be super excited when the fatigue and hunger are no longer making me feel like a zombie.
1/4 cup pureed pumpkin
Roy Johansen, SHADOW ZONE
In all, though, the last inch or two was an exercise in "not fun". So, when the shuttle was empty, I declared it done, hem-stitched it, and cut it off the loom. It's waiting on the washing machine to be run through with the Wednesday laundry before sewing it up into the first of the pair of totes.
The characters are also brilliant! Hanna herself is strange, as you've probably guessed, but it's hard not to love her and feel for her! She's got such a great voice, and can be really quite amusing at times with her strange way of seeing things. Rosalee is just brilliant! Cold and unfeeling at times, which will knock you for six, but it's great to have such a character that'll make you react and feel so strongly! Wyatt, Hanna's love interest, is pretty sweet, really, but I doubt he'd like to hear that. He's clever, quick, and very powerful though, and a combination of Hanna and Wyatt together, well, it makes great reading!
Who hasn’t done the before and after game? You weigh yourself before and after one or more of the following:
THE CENTRAL – MID LEVEL ESCALATOR
Old book pages
Here are some great projects from the DT this week.
Interpublic has, however, been cited as the only firm to be in “dialogue” with Mr. Liu about complying, whereas Omnicom Group has declined to provide the information requested.
Manuael Ernest Dillow, 60, of Kingsport, Va., was charged with 12 felony counts of brandishing a firearm on school property, the Kingsport Times News reported.
home in the U.S. They really are so sweet... romantic and sad all in one.
“We are gravely concerned and sympathise with the affected people. Their source of livelihood –padi, cocoa, coconut, pepper, palm oil and fruit trees – has been destroyed by salt water caused by the continuous tidal floods.
I've grown to love veggie burgers over the past several years. It all stemmed from my college anatomy class. I won't go into any details (this is a food blog, after all), but let's just say that it turned me away from eating red meat for the better part of 5 years. My sweet mom would make a separate pot of vegetable/beef soup, spaghetti sauce, and other beef meals just for me. I'm sure she's glad those days are over (I know my husband is glad those days are over).
I'm sure those of you who are farther along in your CF journey can decode this easily, and probably explain all this way better than I can, but I am still fairly illiterate when it comes to reading and understanding these values. The GREAT news is that Brett's FEV.5 went up drastically - 40%. This is an incredible improvement. One we are so very happy about and grateful for. But this blessing is tempered with the knowledge that these scores do not mean that his lung disease is not severe. It is. Worse than most CF kids his age. In fact, after last years, CT scan on his lungs, our doctor told me his lungs look like what you would expect a CF teenager's to look like. Today when we were discussing the findings, I got that sick, sinking feeling you get when you talk about your child having an inspid disease like cystic fibrosis, and the description on his report reads, "severe obstructive airway
Best Director: Michel Hazanavicius, The Artist
GasBuddy has many Features & Benefits for a successful television commercial including::
Yes, this is the kind of sage-like medical advice my dad was doling out in the middle of the living room. As I sat and watched his face light up with every word flying out of Madison’s mouth, it occurred to me that my dad likely has never had the chance to play like this, either. Oh, I’m sure I made him pretend to be Star Scream (so I could be Optimus Prime, of course) at some point in my childhood, but that’s straight-up masculine. He looked like he enjoyed being bossed around by the animal doctor. He asked questions and smiled whenever Madison would answer him with 4-year old logic.
We all breathed a huge sigh of relief.Just the last minute vanilla cream and decoration to pipe onto the required two trifles and we were on the home straight.
Jan 16 – Police conclude their probe into the NFCorp, and present their findings to the Attorney-General for further action.
At closed-door conferences and strategic seminars organised by Aman ki Asha, thought-leaders and opinion-makers have discussed sensitive issues including water, media, security, Kashmir, and terrorism (former heads of RAW and ISI attended the last one). Their joint statements reflect consensus on key issues.
Here is another 13 inch doll, Zombie Zoey, inbetween two of the smaller dolls, Eris and Celina. Don't fret, Zoey has excellent will power.
The Slippery Slope Problem: Should we even begin to punish attempts in addition to completed crimes?
“This cannot be explained by their socio-economic backgrounds or the characteristics of schools or educational systems. So what is the reason? It is very well possible that they are being discriminated against, but this also holds true for non-Islamic children. People will say: they are the children of migrant workers, but so were the Italians. The remaining factor is religion.”
Thank you everyone who participated in my first ever blog hop! I had a whole lot of fun and I hope you did, too. Now, it is the time you've all been waiting for - the time to announce the winner!
We brought out the cake for her and it took a minute for it was soften up a bit where should could take a good bite out of it. I ordered the cake from a dog bakery in San Diego. They were great to work with and it got here in one piece and was absolutely adorable! I couldn't have been more pleased. Maggie was also spoiled with gifts of treats and toys. We gave her a ball and she popped it in 5 minutes. Good thing it was only $5.
Then again a period; when river flows
But, she works them hard!
"Thus, again, it cannot be considered accident that in 1950 the dominant power of the world was barely able to contain the ground attack of an almost illiterate nation of nine million- nor could it have done so without the enormous manpower sacrifices of its Korean ally."
Besides what was going on in my head, I didn't get stuff done around the house. All I wanted to do was keep her from getting hurt again. Don't run! Slow down! Be careful! I didn't make dinner. I didn't do laundry. I just disconnected from the domesticity for a few days, and I'm only just now catching up.
“They’re non-believers” he says and he stops
Mdluli was suspended last year in connection with the 1999 kidnapping and murder. He was also charged with defrauding the police and a Pretoria car dealership of more than R90 000, and for causing it to lose a further R1.28 million.
She is a legend, well-known and respected for her unique vision and her signature style. The images are soft, romantic, melancholic, timeless, and bring together the powerful ingredients of fairytale darkness, beauty and tragedy. MAGICAL!
Much less than imagined
My blogging seems to have come to a halt this summer and going into fall I haven't seen much improvement. I once again have to say I am sorry for all the lack of posts. I will try harder.
Welcome to our third Get Growing entry. This series will span 12 months, and is designed to help aspiring vegetable gardeners get out of the kitchen and into the garden. On the first of each month, we will discuss one garden project for the novice vegetable gardener. Because we are located in Houston, Texas, our growing conditions differ from many parts of the English-speaking world. To help guide gardeners in cooler climates, our Get Growing partner is Daphne of Daphne's Dandelions. Daphne gardens in Boston, and she will be providing monthly advice for Northern gardeners (although her excellent site is a wonderful resource for gardeners everywhere). For Get Growing in February, Daphne discusses compost: what it is, how to make it, and how to use it Regardless of where you live, her advice is invaluable.
Reading Modes – There are two modes for readers: Read it Myself and Read to Me. We’ve seen the latter in action in the video above. The text is read aloud as each page opens, and then children can explore the page before turning the page with a swipe. The Read it Myself option has no narration, however children can tap on text to have the page read. At this stage there is no option for individual words to be read aloud. Blue Quoll is considering adding a third option that would automatically turn the pages.
I recently saw a Facebook picture of an old high school acquaintance and she'd snapped her young kids with real guns in their hands. I don't just have a different opinion I think she's an irresponsible mother and I wouldn't let my kids play with hers. Yikes, I'd never thought I'd hear myself say something like that, but I feel in my gut that it is morally repugnant to give a child a real gun. The idea actually makes me sick.
a mere 13 or 14 days after this last heavy wet blizzard ...
Here are some examples I have in addition to my paycheck
A Masterpiece of Modern Horror, indeed. I can't say anything about The Shining that hasn't already been said or parodied. It is a movie that I find is immensely watchable, scary and intellectual. I've known people who have written their graduate thesis' on this darn movie. Apparently, they passed after filling a hundred pages with "All work and no play makes Jack a dull boy" then claiming it's post modern (or po-mo).
White door where a lady takes my pile of paperwork that is more or less pretty much sort of good enough but only because it is Friday and she is in a good mood. And from there, she slaps a new fancy sticker in my passport and tells me I can now go through the next door....
Enough is enough. Now is the time to stand up against bullying. Join myself and the entire Young Detroit Show staff on Stand 4 Change Day and be a part of this historic rallying point for the anti-bullying movement.
And with that....here is the final BLOG BIRTHDAY FREEBIE! ;-)
We're chez nous tonight, as usual, having a blast of popcorn, great music, probably some Jools Holland, some sparklers, and definitely the London fireworks on tv at midnight. And a splendidly undisturbed lie-in in the morning. 6 Music's been on all afternoon - bah humbug to whichever government, tory or labour, had the daft idea to try to axe it.
As I also mentioned previously, Elance voiceover jobs seemed to pay lower than other P2P sites’ jobs. Though I don’t want to give away any juicy details about my next entry (“30 Days on Voices.com”), I wonder if rates on *all* the P2P sites are lower than what I thought. After all, most listings on Voice123 and Voices offer a rate range, and artists are able to propose whatever amount they choose. In other words, perhaps Elance does NOT pay less than the other sites, but is just more transparent about what jobs are paying. Something to chew on.
P.S – this post isn’t aimed at anybody nor any Religion. if It seems offensive in any way, I humbly apologize. Gracias.
I want to get the word out about an event called Arizona Strings, that involves buying and drinking Sierra Nevada products (in the Phoenix area) and seeing proceeds from your purchase to go benefit Operation HomeFront.
I used my new nesties and my art impression stamps! I made the pattern paper and coloured with copics. I still have a lot to learn about copic markers but practice makes perfect right!!
But memories are funny things. As in, I always forget them when they matter. The ladies and I started our Friday evening with a few shots at a local craft distillery's tasting room. Then we walked up to Poquitos on Capitol Hill and had a couple margaritas. Then we went across the street to Moe Bar where there was dancing paired with several vodka cranberries.
Level 13: MP Cost: 60, Damage: 229%, Attacks up to 6 enemies 6 times, 23% chance to stun the enemy for 5 seconds.
Christmas day is the ultimate 'being in the moment' moment.
1 pound smoked chopped beef brisket
I tweeted about this awhile ago but I haven't put my twitter back so I figured you should all take a look at a dose of crazy; Acne, these are stupid hot.
the team has made to most amazing things.
the Spoonies said...
There were people who didn't like Munson, of course, but it seems most people did, even those who despised Georgia or biased announcers. The bias wasn't the point. He just made it fun. He was over-the-top. He was literary and wacky and unpredictable. He was both intensely cynical ("We have no chance today," was pretty much how he approached every game) and starry eyed. He brought the same energy and wonderment and ferocity to every game. When the Bulldogs were losing, he was sure they would lose. When they were winning, he was warning about disasters lingering just around the corner (Hunker down!). And when Georgia actually won cherokee roses bloomed, Ray Charles sang, moonlight slipped through the pines.
“Hmmm, you like the geh abi?” I could only nod,
anyway, here is my kitchen before: wooden cabinetry, yellow walls, stone backsplash and black granite countertops. some people would love it...it just wasn't my style!
I got one life, one life, one life
As a music consultant, I like bands to clearly lay out how every purchase is made and who will get what in the end. Is the band paying for something for an individual where in turn, that individual has to pay the band as a whole back? How is it going to work? If you are not one hundred percent sure, you might want to sit down and discuss it and you will want to talk about it prior to the purchase.
The other winner from Random.Org is:
with minds that accuse,
Simply Gorgeous green chico bag
Some have been warning us for years that there are forces within this land which are committed to destroying everything which is great about Great Britain. For a long time they were lonely voices calling to deaf ears, although more recently others, including one time New Labour voters, such as myself, have begun to see the truth in what they are have been telling us, and to appreciate the growing threat which we, as a nation, face.
In no certain order:
In South Africa we know about Gold. The mining and production process from raw material rock into pure refined Gold is very interesting. There is a thin vein of gold that runs deep below the surface, sometimes kilometres deep. Highly qualified people need to find this vein of gold. Heavy duty equipment must be used to drill and create a mine shaft down to the gold. The raw rock extracted from the surface and then a mine created along the thin vein of gold in the rock face. For every little 4 grams or pure gold, on average of a crazy amount of about 3,200 tons of raw material rock is required to be extracted from the deep! These rocks are then crushed by heavy duty crushers into a fine powder. Cyanide is added to the powder to reduce the content of the raw material. Sulphuric acid and zinc are added somewhere in the process, which cleans, magnetises and attracts all the remaining metal particles. These remaining metals are then placed in 1,063 degrees centegrade heat furnace, where all the metals are disintegrated leaving only pure gold behind. This liquid +99.5% pure gold is then poured into a mould and solidified into a beautiful, pure and refined 12.5kg gold bar.
"Why not!!" yell out Lieutenant Britney and her girlfriend T'Pol almost together.
Anyway, I love your blog and I love that someone else is as crazy as I am when it comes with organizing!
I very highly recommend this book. If you enjoy historical fiction, then this is an outstanding one. The writing is exquisite and it is rich with historical detail. The story is told as Axel telling his story in his memoirs. Most of the story is narrative, and a great deal of the book is historical detail. It’s a very detailed telling of the lives of these historical figures but also adds an emotional aspect of the story by telling this from the point of view of the man who loved Marie Antoinette. This is the first book that I have read by Francine du Plessix Gray, but I hope to read more of her work in the future. She obviously did a great deal of research for this story and definitely shows.
(wake up Africa wake up and stop blaming)
votes don’t generate consumption.
Then it only remained as to what use we could put the empty boxes. I thought cut price coffins would work. First born, of his own volition, hid in an upright one and jumped out and scared the pants off darling boy. He said he learnt this skill set from Australia's Funniest Home Videos .... oh dear.
I murmur. I know. Soon, the cold winds will curl up and roll into the hearts of seas. Heat will seep off iced waters and the dark earth. I know a clump of snowdrops by the gate will spawn again, shy as virgins who would never look up to their lovers’ eyes. In a while, crocuses will sprout buds like pursed lips, waiting for a kiss. Not filigreed lawns but mantled front gardens of Queen Anne’s lace will soon spark.
Speaking of the Hubs, seems as though W is finally taking a shine to him. Yeah, so it’s only taken about 26 months and the Hubs IS his dad, I promise. He’s finally realizing that he's Disneyland on legs. “I wanna fie, I wanna fie!” he says as the Hubs picks him up and swings him through the air. “C’mon, daddie, c’mon daddie, c’mon daddie” he repeats as he heads to his room. “Daddie play guitar!” he yells while sitting behind his little drum kit just about every morning. And for your viewing pleasure here’s daddy and W jamming away now…
Men should beware of a woman when she loves: for then it is ready for any sacrifice, and everything else has no value in her eyes.
I didn’t get to take too many pictures because I was too busy looking at the showrooms and chatting up with people.
The set up to the finale does its job, but really seems slapped together at the last second. The writers thought they’d have another season to tell this story, but had to make do with just a few episodes.
DNA is designed as an informational source to receive the energy of that which is around it, created by the consciousness of humanity. It then postures itself in an appropriate reaction to the energy it is in. In other words, if the planet has low energy, it will, too. It’s a quantum engine, and if the quantum energy created by Human consciousness is low, it works poorly.
I got this recipe from the Smitten Kitchen blog. Since I didn't stray from the recipe at all (shocking I know!) you can read the recipe here.
What do you think? Would your daughter love to get something like this?
do they realize their own illusion?
So now it is mid-afternoon and I am just now getting to my blog. I almost just posted an excerpt from my humor book, but then I decided that I just had to comment on the latest nonsense in politics.
10. Give up labels. Stop labeling those things, people or events that you don’t understand as being weird or different and try opening your mind, little by little. Minds only work when open. “The highest form of ignorance is when you reject something you don’t know anything about.” Wayne Dyer
Good news for all those favoring warmer beer, but for the remainder, the number of functioning taps plummets by 12 (all Saturnalia selections, by the way, and I doubt there'll be damage to the beers), at least until repair is facilitated. I hope that's today.
In Otaku: Japan’s Database Animals, Azuma Hiroki proposes a different model of narrative consumption. The Japanese title of Azuma’s cultural study, Dōbutsuka suru posutomodan: Otaku kara mita Nihon shakai, is revealing. The first word of this title refers to the concept of “animalization” proposed by Alexandre Kojève in The Roots of Postmodern Politics. This animalization involves the degradation of humans (independent subjects capable of reasoning, directed action, and compassion) into animals (mindless consumers who act on impulses such as hunger and the drive for greater comfort). It is Azuma’s thesis that otaku and, by extension, the society that has spawned them are becoming increasingly animalized. Azuma describes the narrative and cultural consciousness characteristic of otaku through what he calls the database model of narrative consumption.
So, what do I think about this? To start, I probably should have gone with “ethics” instead of “morals” in the original note, so we’ll be jumping trains for this entry.
But the last choice is still the same;
April 15– Tuesday– Staunton, Virginia– The Staunton Spectator reports on the worthy war efforts by Southern women. “The laudable and patriotic labors of the ladies have not failed to be observed and appreciated by the Congress of the Confederacy, as will be seen by reference to the following resolution recently adopted by that body: Resolved, by the Congress of the Confederate States of America, That the thanks of the Congress of the Confederate States are eminently due, and are hereby tendered to the patriotic women of the Confederacy, for the energy, zeal and untiring devotion which they have manifested in furnishing voluntary contributions to our soldiers in the field, and in the various military hospitals throughout the country.”
Length : 27" (Excluded Straps)
Yes, this empire was quite something to marvel at: its athletic dominance was unmatched in collegiate sports and it thought nothing of its traditional rivals, treating them like conquered provincial barbarians. Yet within one year of the zenith of their power, glory and dominance, the Cow-Worshipers would suffer humiliating defeats at the hands of barbarians from the hinterlands, whom they had long overlooked as just another subjugated race.
Paul V. Barbaro, 35, Holmdel, N.J.
Sad at seeing the awful way that we humans treat each other and how we look for ways to choose one side of an issue and to be 'right'.
1. Slice your butternut squash in half lenthwise and put face down on a cookie sheet. We use wax paper sheets in my house or we just spray the pan with a little oil. Put these in the oven on 350 until they are soft throughout.
Once we have recorded the song then we can take a decision accordingly. I am in
Do you have a Flashback you'd like to add? Put your link here:
Fiona Apple
It's heavy cast iron with perfect chippy white paint.
to say hello to my Mom. HIYA MOM! I bet she has looked
And can I say I am getting uber excited for the holiday season?!?!
So, today our order of Sierra Nevada Summerfest arrived. But it wasn't Summerfest. It was Sierra Nevada's new autumn seasonal beer called Tumbler. This is a new beer they are using to replace the very popular Anniversary Ale (as this year is their 30th anniversary, Sierra Nevada is putting out 4 one-time brews for commemoration). The Tumbler sounds delicious, and I can't wait to try it. But, I have problems with the timing of the release. Here are some:
They also quote Do a Barrel Roll, which makes me wish I had stayed in my home-schooling program.
I have my flat white with two sugars so I get a lovely sugar hit too.
Just a few verbal snapshots of a lovely, whirlwind Advent weekend. I’m looking forward to the possibility of some stillness later this week…the final pause before the Feast. May you also find some stillness in which to look toward Him with eagerness—and peace.
"Papa, I have a secret to tell you. Why don't you marry Grammy so we can get some babies?"
My family is my everything, and I instinctively wanted to make changes to how we are living in the kitchen due to all the BPA news. I absolutely have heated up many kiddos meals, from oatmeal to hot dogs to everything in between, on and in plastic plates and bowls. And much of what I have read states that BPA is activated and moves to foods mostly through a heating process. That is why we have begun switching to a plastic free kitchen.
Image by Mezza – Child running for the toilet in hope to make it
And they must do it without Clary. For Clary has gone into the heart of darkness, to play a dangerous game utterly alone. The price of losing the game is not just her own life, but Jace’s soul. She’s willing to do anything for Jace, but can she even still trust him? Or is he truly lost? What price is too high to pay, even for
At the start of the movie, Bruegel is still working on the design of the painting. We see sketches, and we hear him as he explains the why, and the what, and the how that go into the painting. He tells us that he watched a spider whose web of concentric circles, all connected by a latticework, is his inspiration for the painting’s design.
The basement fought back.
(I did do it myself in class one day when I was handwriting more of my script rather than paying attention to “Death of a Salesman,” but by then I had been using Celtx for a few days and knew what the script should look like. Later that night I brought the paper to Biggby for our write-in, and it made Feliza’s diaphragm contort in hilarity.)
One of the most fascinating aspects to me in all of this is: Lets assume you offer all the choices in the world to your customer. This customer defies what studies show and decides to buy from you anyway… the studies show that this same customer is not going to be satisfied with his purchase. In the HVAC (or other service related industry) the number one contractor complaint is call backs. What does an unsatisfied customer do? They call you back, taking away any profits you may have made on that job. The kicker in all of this is that your unsatisfied customer is very unlikely to refer your company to friends/family/associates. Referrals are the lifeblood of most HVAC contractors I work with…
"The risk is always there. There is always lots of tinder about and there are a lot of unresolved issues, including Abyei," said Derek Plumbly, chairperson of the Assessment and Evaluation Commission that monitors the north-south peace deal.
40. Babies are born with 300 bones, but by adulthood the number is reduced to 206.
I'm thankful that the people at E's school understand the severity of his allergies and take them seriously. His school is peanut-free, he takes his own food and has a supply of snacks at school. The school contacts us regularly to check on ingredients for projects or special occasions.
Be back to blogging with a giveaway in a couple weeks. Right after finals!
The Collect.
Does KRS-One just choose to operate in the shadows, as he probably did all those years ago as a teenage graffiti artist in the Bronx? Is it simply a matter of the cliché about people not wanting to hear The Hard Truth? Is he too anti-establishment, too spiritual? Maybe. But, just as happened with his Stop The Violence Movement in 1989, once again a positive message in hip-hop is ignored (squashed?) while bling, beef, and bullet holes make the headlines.
Oh, and today was a teachers jeans day at school.... I slipped my jeans on and I could tell there was a difference in them..... from one week, 5 classes. And two people said I was looking good. Totally made my day.
It's that time again! We've created a HOT new meme called SWOON #YABound, and if you're new to the game, here's how to join in the fun:
Dish: BLT Guacamole
Obviously, the President has spent time giving this issue serious consideration, and his view has been shaped by conversations with his family, his friends, neighbors, and the people who work with him at the White House.
The second route outlined by Mr Anwar is the Scottish Criminal Cases Review Commission. At any time after the normal appeal process is exhausted, a person who has been convicted can apply to the SCCRC if they consider that they have been the victim of a miscarriage of justice. The SCCRC will investigate the case and determine if they think there is an arguable case. If so, they can refer the case back to the High Court. Effectively this gives the appellant a second appeal, and if the SCCRC refer a case, it is treated as having passed through the sift process.
Title: Shop Instructor, part-time/on-call @ Art Center
For some reason or another, the colors on the rose coupled with the dark background remind me of horror stories…
I’m the car in the weeds
(I apologize my english in this post, I’m sleepy)
Category: 54 Scottish-Style Ale - 22 Entries
At moments like this, I wish I was the type of person to swill cheap gin early in the morning. After all, it's stupid somewhere, right?
“Hi, Dad.” I wrapped my arms around one of the table’s legs. My eyes burned with tears. I didn’t hold them back. But it was fine since no one could see me.
Stone Brewing Co. Stone 08.08.08 Vertical Epic Ale
I use what I call the “Umbrella Approach.” I sort of know where the story starts and ends in a general way, but I then let the characters take over and tell the rest. It’s much better for me that way. A perfect example is the character Robard. Originally, I thought he and Tristan would meet briefly in Book One, then reconnect in Book Three. But the moment he stepped on the page he was so forceful he demanded to stay. And the series is so much the richer for it.
¾ tsp. salt
First, marshal your facts into a coherent narrative which will persuade both the legislature and the public that costly prison beds should be reserved for those whom we reasonably fear; and, second, that effective probation supervision, proven substance abuse treatment programs, and short-term confinement when necessary, should be strengthened and tweaked to keep Texans and their property secure.
We both need this trip, for many reasons, some our own, some to find each other. I have no real expectations, nor fatherly advice to give, except to simply be together in the mountains for the next five days. I am leaving the past where it is out in the world, and resolve to simply be present and in each moment with my son. It feels real here in the Ruahine.
The outcomes of keeping recreational marijuana use illegal will save Arizona from the increase of drug-related fatal car accidents, and protect the mental health of residents. Smoking weed recreationally should remain against the law.
Am I too soft??
Look at that face ~ what a cute kid ~ and yes, I am totally biased and not afraid to admit it!
Hydration: In addition to my green juice, green smoothies, and green blended soups, I am also drinking plenty of spring water (we get it delivered at work and I fill 'er up.) I am wearing out a path to the loo but my skin looks and feels awesome and I feel great. Now that it is getting cold up here in the Pacific NW, I am drinking lots of Good Earth tea, which I love, and has such good ingredients: Red Rooibos (antioxidants!) Dandelion, Ginger, Ginseng, Rose Hips (vitamin C!) and the cinnamon in it makes it taste super sweet and no sugar at all. I do love a nice hot cup of tea on a cold day!
And the darkness turns in its sleep, and yearns
Living in the full acceptance of our vulnerability, is the way to a more fulfilling life and enlightenment. Not controlling, not being controlled too though. Not upholding disaster in mind simply because this life is risk, but not looking to find shelter and hide either. It is a middle path, like the tight rope walker’s path. He or she knows that there is always a probability of a fall but they use that probability to keep them securely on the rope; to be alert, to take the next step freely but with measure (“to move with all deliberate speed” as one American High Court judge had said (if I remember rightly)) and to keep moving forward because there is no place to stop and remain idle. Life here moves ever forward like a flowing river.
Malcolm came to me in a dream last night and got me to stop this obvious sham of a self-promoting non-real auction and as such the item is no longer for sale. Although I believe you can acquire one of your own by doing the Edinburgh Festival and being mental enough.
Then while walking around the movie location after lunch, my buddy and I ran into Stuart Wilson (whom we had met on Monday on the set), who has long been Bruce Willis's stunt double. He's a super nice guy, and he told us he would be coming to the marine house event Friday evening.
They said to them, “Why do you seek the living one among the dead? He is not here, but he has been raised.* Remember what he said to you while he was still in Galilee, that the Son of Man must be handed over to sinners and be crucified, and rise on the third day.”
The patents will be grouped into lots when they relate to a common area. Some lots will include additional material such as prototypes of products, inventor notebooks, and, in one case, 80 hours with the inventor to aid in transferring expertise. At the end of each auction, Ocean Tomo will get 25% of the sale price.
Tools: Big Shot (yes, somehow, I managed to squeeze my Go Kreate die into my Big Shot:)), My Singer sewing machine- got to mention it because it did all the job...lol)
Well, it turns out that not only may she not be a Cherokee, there is an additional twist.
2 tablespoons butter, chilled and cut into small pieces
supper - Saag Aloo (potatoes and spinach) co-op recipe
Kitchen: Minor Remodel Job Cost: $19,588 Resale Value: $14,120 Cost Recouped: 72.1%
Favorite hobby: Besides playing hockey, working on my tan.
Whereas sacred objects used in Christian rituals are treated with deifying awe, objects such as Mayan crosses can be recycled, bartered with, communicated with, manipulated, disregarded, or destroyed the apparent equivalent of extorting or defacing a holy image of Christ or the Virgin Mary. Astor-Aguilera holds that we cannot fully understand these indigenous practices by fitting them to our European Cartesian mindset but must instead recognize and try to understand native Mayan epistemology.
A szerelékek is nagyon édesek, bár dilemmába estem, mert a párom áthelyezte őket egy asztalról a másikra, és úgy rémlett 3 db halacska volt, de fotózásra csak 2 jelent meg. Remélem meg lesz a 3. is ha volt.
There’s some good music on this summary track for the final credits. It’s not all-out bombast – there are some quieter moments. There’s some clumsy edits though that makes this sound like a suite made in the editing suite rather than being an actual composed piece of music.
No doubt there will be more protests tomorrow, and the democratic delegation in exile doesn't seem too keen on growing backbones and coming back and dealing with the $3+ billion budget gap their state elected them to deal with any time soon. How in the world are we supposed to get out of the looming fiscal ruin we are facing not just in individual states but nationally if no one is willing to make the cuts?
(3) bags of Quakes
There are contradictory currents at work on a mega scale this May with Mars and the Moon opposing Neptune and Chiron so favouring overt zeal, destructive partisanship, ideologically-driven warfare (Mars) and self-doubt on a wider and deeper basis (the Moon). Life-splitting events may follow through out there in the world yet all the while it is our spiritual and personal relationship issues that are ever carrying us forward. Find time for the inner you. Tough-talking Uncle Saturn in Libra should introduce a more sensible, lasting quality to the erupting social debates (spurred by the Grand Trine of Mercury Mars and Pluto) that tremble on the edge of becoming fist-fights and yet to harmonize with the greater group will become much more possible whether we like what prompts that change or not. The biggest fight could be within ourselves as we each tackle the demands of self and our competitiveness vs. the needs of our greater group, humanity at large.
Well… who needs bubbles anyway?
Stampin Up Cardstock Perfect Plum, Pretty in Pink and White
Finally My image was positioned at an angle. I made my own mini flowers with pearl or button centres. I added a lare yellow scroll and also cut some smaller Paisley style cuts from Joycraft 01.
8 oz spinach (can skip and add more romaine)
Hugh McDonald – Bass (1994-Present)
His eyes darkened to brown velvet. “I’m glad.”
Prosecutors plied suspects, claiming to want to give them the opportunity to tell their side of the story. Suspects who could afford and had retained private counsel were not subjected to the interviews.
(no longer reasonable probably–)
An advertising campaign aimed at users of social media networks does not need to be complicated. Once you start something like this you can keep on educating yourself in the ways you can make it work for you. You must constantly work at this in order to reap the rewards; be sure to keep your information current and update profiles on a consistent basis.
Collecting and shaping: The shea butter, which is creamy or golden yellow at this point, is ladled from the top of the pots and put in cool places to harden. Then it is formed into balls. In the cosmetic industry, shea butter can be refined, either with chemicals such as hexane or by clay filtering.
The book comes with a CD-Rom which enables you to display the activities on an interactive white-board and easily print out the activities and resource sheets. Teacherʼs notes provide helpful hints and extension ideas.
An example being, take 20 square blocks numbered from 1-20; about the size of the blocks that your child would have in his toy chest. Take the first 3 blocks numbered 1-3. Put them in a box and shake them up. Pull each number out and place it into a proposed sequence. The sequence being 1,2,3. The chances of getting these blocks laid down in the proper sequence is 1 to 6 tries. After the 6 tries, the blocks should be in order, 1,2,3. Take 3 more blocks, 4,5,6, and put it in the same box. Shake this up and by chance, by pulling each block out one at a time, your chances are after 120 tries you will get them in sequence, 1-6. Take 4 more blocks and put them in the same box, shake them up. It will take you 3 1/2 million tries to get them in a sequence 1-10. Take 10 more blocks and put them in the same box. Shake the box up and if you pull them out and put them in an attempted sequence 1-20, and you did this 24 hours a day at the rate of 1 lineup per second, it would take you 77 billion years to line the blocks up in a sequence from 1-20 which is “by chance”. Now this is a problem that a group of physicists has figured out.
“You can hear them?” Derrek let himself focus on Naida’s voice. Even thinking about salad was making him hungry.
“What the...” the boy sputtered, finding himself flat on his back. I lay sprawled across him, staring into startled brown eyes.
The Holy Spirit is everywhere at the same time, and you can key in to his vast knowledge, by submitting yourself to God.
The next day Moses said to the people, “You have committed a serious sin. Now I will go up the mountain to the LORD. Maybe I will be able to make a payment for your sin and make peace with the LORD for your sin.“ So Moses went back to the LORD and said, “These people have committed such a serious sin! They made gods out of gold for themselves. But will you forgive their sin? If not, please wipe me out of the book you have written.” he LORD answered Moses, “I will wipe out of my book whoever sins against me. Now, go! Lead the people to the place I told you about. Exodus 32:30-34
For the second Monday post this week, I offer an update on my loan progress.
The Elf is "officially" in Grade One this year and so, as recommended we started our year with lots of form drawing. Using the Christopherus and Waldorf Without Walls books as well as Rudolf Kutzli's first book of form drawing she and I have spent time curving and straightening. We've found these forms in nature and around our home, tracing our fingers over them, using our own bodies, our toes, our fingers in the air and finally on the page. I've stretched myself to come up with stories for each form, some have had The Elf in giggles, other ones have drawn the bigger children in too. We go slowly, dealing with the frustrations that come when your lines and curves don't match mama's.
went to Target and only two books jumped into my cart ;)
Never stop, not for whatever
"It's just a ranking, but I guess it's important. We were proud to be number one but it didn't count for a lot," New Zealand coach Graham Henry told a news conference.
This one poured the way it should. It didn't foam, and didn't have large floaties in it. Medium amount of reddishness, it looks like a straight amber, but has a good tan head that gets pillowy and fades slowly with good carbonation.
A little girl asked her mother one morning as she was preparing lunch, “Mommy, why do you cut the ends off the ham before you cook it?” The girl’s mother turned and looked at her and said, “Oh, sweetie, I’m not really sure why, but I suppose you cut the ends off of the meat so that the meat can better absorb the juices and spices and make it more tender. Maybe you’d better ask Grandma since she was the one I learned it from. She always did it that way.”
I have been using and re-purposing things I already have this year,
The recommended daily dose for adults is 10–15 mg. Kelp can also be made into a tea. To create an infusion, 1 cup of boiling water is poured over 2-3 tsp of dried or powdered kelp. The tea is steeped for 10 minutes, and can be drunk three times daily.
They won’t judge and as friend won’t quit.
Getting to the trail head is an easy drive down the Norton-Bullfrog Rd on the east side of the park. After around 9 miles there is a pull off and a two track that winds a couple of miles up the dry wash to get you closer to the more interesting stuff. There are some loose rocks and deep sand but it was well within the clearance and capabilities of the Outback and Laura and Chris’s RAV 4.
smelling the rich thawed female land, pungent
spaces between things, that the monster at the end
First of all, I have to mention that I saw NKOTB in all of their retro glory again last night. Basically a few tweaks of their first tour but the addition of Popsicle made my friend Sara's night! I will post pics whenever I get home. Again I screamed like I was 9 again and danced around with a bunch of my friends. It was awesome. The night was made complete by the drive by of Waffle House to see all of the silly 20 and 30 something women hoping that the boys (I mean, men) would be dropping by. It was literally a crowded House. Oh, and Donnie or D Dub as you are now called, please stop making the smarmy comments about getting with little girls moms and us having boobs now. It is creeping us out. As Ashley put it, our 9 year old selves are here not our 28 or 29 year old selves. We're too young to hear this kind of talk. Thanks-love you!
She also made us some beets, and I brought them for lunch to work today, a big tupperware that I meant to eat only half of. Big mistake, thought I, as I opened the plastic bag and saw a pool of beet juice on the bottom - now I'll have to eat up the whole thing so it won't leak into my backpack on the way home. So, worried about beet overdose, I started in. And they were delectable. There I sat, waiting for my patients to arrive, tie untucked into shirt, slurping up huge tasty beet hunks with trusty chunks of matzo. I was a beet-scarfing animal. I was a beet plague. I finished it all and I wanted more.
I picked up again, and did R76, a plain
As I said before Nick has never paid one of these PCN’s and still receives them daily. They have tried all sorts of enforcement on Nick to try and get Nick to pay, but all attempts have failed and continue to fail. Nick has said “NO” and will never submit to the deceptive fraudulent practices to gain money used by the company known as Scarborough Council.
We finally left him to his slumber. He’d never know that we were ever there.
2) Twenty questions, four-year-old-style. This is hardly revolutionary, but does pass the time quite nicely. We think of a character from a book or a cartoon and then ask yes/no questions (with no limit on the number you can ask). It helps if the adult goes first with the questions, to give them an idea of what to ask, otherwise you just get “Is it Fireman Sam? Is it Bob the Builder? Is it Postman Pat?” etc.
Oh god, I’m so scared. I just want to know what their reactions are going to be! I know when I look at my siblings’ pictures from the 80s and 90s, I can’t help but laugh every time. When my mom tells me all the names the “flip flop” went through, it amazes me how one thing just travels and eventually the shoe will fit. For a modern day example, how many social networks do we have to get addicted to until we find the right one?
because they recognize his voice.
People are willing to take drastic measures when technology is involved. People have made jokes about how humanity is quickly falling into the world of Wall-E when it comes to dealing with technology. (Just look at the photo used for this blog.) Not only this, but people put all of the information in their lives into one little computer, sometimes just a mobile device. If they lost that, or had it stolen, the repercussions would be huge, but the convenience factor always seems to win out.
with Nature’s rebound
Does this work for guys? If a guy finds out that a woman thinks he's hot, is he more interested in her? Here's a test for the guys. Pretend your friend is talking to you:
State agencies provide many resources online about natural resources and environmental issues in each state. Parks, museums, and nature centers have many special programs for teachers and students. Learn about Florida’s resources and “plan” a trip to one of the areas. Have your student pick a location, schedule events, plan out the resources they would need to get to the location (food, gas, money), and turn it into an inclusive lesson! Perhaps include a Language Experience Story.
the highest pass of the Hindu Kush.
PH too acidic waters with high salt content ferruginous which give a range of reddish colors that give a unique look. Selected by NASA to study microorganisms that live there because of their possible similarity to Mars
Well it started off as normal as all of our other dates. We had set a standard of meeting at a Shopping Center parking lot or at this Country Inn and then driving together from there. Today we met at the Country Inn and were going on a short drive to a diner I knew for lunch and then probably a walk.
I tried to soothe her as best as I could. I probably laughed it away, even though I knew in that very moment she would be getting a divorce. I knew it way before she knew it. Had she been a better friend of mine, it would’ve been a tougher dilemma – my loyalties playing on my need to just get through the gig. But, she wasn’t. She was just a business associate really. Another comic. Another unsure soul, begging strangers for attention.
we have 2 stamps & 2 CPF sheets up for grabs
Austin & MacAuley list their marketing and promotional plans for books here. Much of it appears to involve their own direct marketing efforts through press releases, advance information and offering review copies on request from retail buyer departments and bookstores. Interestingly, I could not find a direct link to this on the Austin & MacAuley website and I only came across the page while doing an online search.
So to celebrate the purchase of that demonic contraption I will be learning how to run on...I went out yesterday and got me some runnin' shoes! Yepperz....they sure are purty and pretty darn comfy, I might add. I tested them out last night on the dready (pet name for the demonic treadmill) and it went well...as well as it could go anyway. I mean I was huffin and puffin at .5 speed and 0 incline.....haha Not really....that would be sad. I look up at the husband and say it's time to tape the girls down because I can't run with them smacking me in the face. He said he doesn't ever remember seeing me run in the 8 years we have been together. I can believe it. I hate running. I told him the Biggest Loser contestants can run at like a 7 while they are training and I attempted that. *Note to self....7.0 is no bueno for Jessica at this point in time. I literally almost buckled and slid off. I am SOOOOO out of shape right now. I don't think I have actually worked out for real in several months. Up until last week my two friends and I were walking 4 miles about 4 nights a week. That did wonders for my calves but not much else. I wasn't getting a burn or anything really. I feel fatter than ever...literally. I don't think I have EVER had this much fat accumulated on my body at once even pre-band. Damn damn damn....
is what I had today! I am in the process of applying for a Hearing Dog for the Deaf and as part of that I was invited to an “information day” at the centre in Buckinghamshire.
So if you read romances, too, who are your favorites?
As I have mentioned before, gtk.gdk.threads_init() is necessary. The gtk.gdk.threads_init() function initializes PyGTK to use the Python macros that allow multiple threads to serialize access to the Python interpreter (using the Python Global Interpreter Lock (GIL)).The gtk.gdk.threads_init() function must be called before the gtk.main() function. At this point in the application the Python GIL is held by the main application thread. You can get more information about gtk.gdk.threads_init() and GIL here in pygtk docs.
The last said while peering intently through the back of my car. Actually, it was "Where did you get all this stuff, anyway?" like I must have stolen it, or was revenging myself upon a librarian ex-boyfriend. God forbid I should be capable of reading an actual book, or even worse, many.
Hi ^__^
Here are a few of the costumes, and hopefully more will begin to appear online as the days go by. I cannot find a single one of Alexis/Molly all glammed up for an evening out at the club which may have been my favorite - the hairstyle alone is worth another look. But she looks extremely cute in this outfit. Oh how I wish I was born a red-head!
It had adorable clothes and the prices were very good.
Second Card:
Though I speak with the tongues of men and of angels, and have not charity, I am become as sounding brass, or a tinkling cymbal. And though I have the gift of prophecy, and understand all mysteries, and all knowledge; and though I have all faith, so that I could remove mountains, and have not charity, I am nothing. And though I bestow all my goods to feed the poor, and though I give my body to be burned, and have not charity, it profiteth me nothing.
Yes, the batting was disappointing.
Mbeki, who has followed a pro-business line since taking over from Nelson Mandela as president in 1999, agreed on Saturday to accept the ANC's request that he resign before the end of his term next year.
This basic service package is free. For the $49 package, you get the basics plus conversion services (if you don't want to DIY), the ability to include images, fancier cover design options, and a free download of your ebook. There's also a $189 package; the only difference between it and the $49 package seems to be that BookTango will "handle the paperwork and get your e-book properly protected under U.S. copyright regulations." Since copyright registration is not only very easy to accomplish yourself, but costs just $35 if you do it online, there doesn't appear to be a single reason to spring for this.
The past week was very uneventful from the public viewpoint. Mr. Obama met with Senior Advisers 2 times and had 3 daily briefings.
02. Everybody Knows This Is Nowhere
I am fully me.
As a final note, I want to make it clear that I do not wish to romanticize or idealize a kind of abjected gay-maleness from the past. Reading about Genet’s early life in Halperin’s book only made me intensely glad that I didn’t have to live through that kind of abjection. But I do personally take great pleasure, really a thrill that sometimes literally brings tears to my eyes, when a Sister of Perpetual Indulgence passes me on the street, or when the leather daddy who lives in the apartment below me leaves his apartment in full regalia with a suitcase full of dangerous implements of degrading pleasure, or when two of the men I love the most in my gay life recount their sexual exploits in a threesome or in making a new porn video. These are all parts of gay-maleness that seem to me to be more than aesthetic and sexual throw-backs; but are pieces of our collective ongoing glorification of the abjection that comes now not from our social exclusion, but from our social normalization.
Every Wednesday I meet with friends to play Pathfinder
Here in Spain I’m doing a pilates class. It isn’t the first time I have done one, but it is the first time in about 5 years. I really want to get back into shape, get flexible, feel good about myself etc, so I push myself. I push myself hard, really, until I really really want to stop because my muscles are screaming at me for torturing me, and I’m shaking as I strain to hold a position. And I enjoy pushing myself hard, because it allows me to improve, I don’t go home feeling as if I slacked off, but rather that I did really well. Now, I have heard comments from people talking about yoga classes, that it isn’t a competition and whatnot, and I guess the same should go for pilates. But for me, it is a competition, because I like the inspiration to do well, to try harder. But this also leads me to judge the other people in my class. I go to these classes with my flatmate, and I can’t help but judge how she does everything, and how little effort she puts in! I feel bad for this, but I keep finding myself thinking she needs to try harder, stop making excuses (which she does), make an effort to watch the instructor to ensure she is doing things right, etc.
By Simon Bienkowski
On Sunday morning
*Can be found at CedarShop.net in its varying cuts.
-”What are these notes for?”.
10. have fun and enjoy your life…
Ted laughs, "That was what exactly what I said to Jay and Arthur."
And of course, one of the best parts of the show is seeing which CEO is stingy and which ones are super generous. Watching the reactions of the trainers is priceless as well. If you’re in the mood for a feel good show, this is it.
If I worked as much as others, I would do as little as they. That’s my story and I’m sticking too it!
beneath our feet a chain-mail carpet with
But even slightly dated, Gimme a Kiss was still the fast-paced, riveting Christopher Pike I remember being glued to way back in the ‘90s. It’s a pretty quick read, perfect for imbibing your nostalgia, or just for a fun, gripping, twisty-turny edge-of-your-seat read.
Every day,
“Screw critical acclaim!” she exclaimed, twisting her finger into my chest. “I just wanna give guys a hard-on!”
And here are the winners of the crates of clementines from Spain!
I've been thinking about clarity and how much I love it, when I realized that maybe my feelings of conflictedness come (at least sometimes) from a clarity I wish were different, not a complete lack of clarity. Maybe sometimes it is because I don't like the answer. And that realization was uncomfortable. And worthy of consideration.
You're probably thinking I should get a life. Right?
I have to admit – I was not pleased. In her defence, she knew I would feel that way and she told me I was allowed to kill her – in my writing. So I stewed over what she said, thought about her comments, and wondered if I should try to find an editor who actually liked fantasy fiction. Then, after awhile, the words of advice sunk in and I realised she was right – I was going to redo it …..only not like she’d suggested, well not quite.
I took to hiking canyons steep and dry,
He goes on to describe the language of these "patois-speaking street gangs" as "pseudo-Afro-Caribbean 'Jafaican'", which I'd argue isn't really a good way of describing it, but he has a point about the constant reinvention of slang, and as an author and expert in the field, he knows his onions.
It’s time for Ralphie’s in-home haircut!
"The information sharply contradicts the assessment by some that Iran has not yet made the decision to go forward with the weapons program, as well as the observation by others who suggest that the Supreme Leader Ali Khamenei has forbidden the development of a nuclear bomb, because it would be a 'sin' to do so," the report said.
“My research has found that on all but a handful of issues in Congress … the voting of black Democrats and white liberals is nearly identical,” he said. The issues where he sees separation are housing, urban development and civil rights.
Game notes: This was the culumination of two sessions actually. One day between battles we were short a player so I had the guys play an out of chronological order scene as members of Osprem's Kiss on the island. For me, the way the various ships and crews' paths have intertwined has been the best part of this campaign so far. Who says splitting the party is bad?
Are you looking for new, unique, and exciting history. It's also a great place for you. If you do not have double fun by having a cruise and moonlight cruise that you can have here. If you enjoy video game based slots, Skydancer offers a great selection in addition to hosting weekly racing events. Regular races at the north dakota maquest and then click on your North Dakota unclaimed money, waiting to be less than stellar, so make sure you investigate before relocating.
Perhaps when I show my next creation someone in my family will say - "That's nice, ARTIST". Has a nice ring to it, doncha think??
that one of the poor wee birdie's eye
- no one will notice these socks don't match
EPISODE 165
in dreams
Now the Minister didn’t really answer the question asked of him, which is surprising really, given how expert he was in the workings of NAMA just a month ago when he danced his jig to repay the Anglo promissory note. Irelandis undoubtedly coming under pressure from the ECB to redeem the NAMA bonds which involves NAMA redeeming the bonds with the banks and the banks redeeming the bonds with the ECB which is presently lending funds to the banks secured on the NAMA bonds as collateral. But as our Finnish friend might say “pacta sunt servanda” and the “pacta” that underpin the NAMA bonds say that the bonds don’t need be repaid until 2020 and that they cost NAMA a measly 1.25% at present. And according to the “pacta” that underpin the operation of NAMA, NAMA can use its cash not just to “advance funds to projects, including projects located in Ireland, under the control of its debtors or receivers” as Minister Noonan coyly says above but in accordance with section 2 and 14 of the NAMA Act, can use its funds to support the economy.
The inhabitants of Graynier are unwittingly drawn into the mystery, as it becomes clear: someone must pay in the present for what happened in the past. For somewhere in this town is her killer, who also has come back incarnated as a different person.
“Behave.” They close the door.
I’ve always been interested in the ways that people construct narratives of sickness, and the sickness persona. I was watching a comedian recently who brought up the subject of the ‘phoning in sick’ voice; the slightly husky, weak and tired tone people adopt when they have to convince the boss that they really are ill, and not having a ‘duvet day’. One day there’s going to have to be a study of the language and art of phoning in sick – stuff like having been ‘up all night’ being ill, ‘really don’t think I can make it in today’, ‘see how I feel tomorrow’ are all stalwarts. But sufferers have always constructed and deployed sickness in some measure. When I was researching for my book I looked at petitions by the sick poor in the seventeenth century, written to try and convince the parish authorities to give them money.
A bit too easy. I got something like 60+ lives pretty fast. I dont mind games being easy these days and Mario should work for everyone, but I think the design-decision of giving the player invicibility after dying a few times in quick succession, is not a great one. It sure was a design decision that caused a lot of back and forth with the game’s designers, but I find it a negative decision. There’s a good variety of levels and the later you get into the game, the more 3D comes into play.
My laughter and my tears.
I do not want our world to loose the Fijian culture, the Mexican, Scandinavian or Peruvian cultures, nor do I wish the world to lose our white, British, culture, there is no conflict between the two, both are essential to the preservation of our world and they do not mean I hate anyone.
My no one on the ground / without trainer status take on the canter-fest issue is... I definitely don't have the basics of the canter depart down. Some of it may be that Val is delighted to canter. I am as well, but we are restricted by occasionally deep footing and limited space to work in until my real arena is completed. (long story for another post)
